Nevada, session 83, AB584.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 385 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. It is the intent of the Legislature to:
(a) Enhance the efficiency of education reporting
requirements by eliminating the reporting of redundant
information and data, reducing administrative burdens and
ensuring that all reports serve a meaningful purpose in supporting
educational outcomes.
(b) Ensure that teachers and school administrators, who are
directly impacted by reporting requirements, have agency in
recommending modifications to reporting requirements.
(c) Preserve transparency, the accountability of public schools
and school districts for the quality of schools and the educational
achievement of pupils, and the accessibility of information and
data concerning the educational achievement of pupils.
2. A teacher or school administrator employed at a public
school, a charter management organization that operates a
charter school or an educational management organization that
provides support or operations to a charter school may submit a
petition to modify, suspend or eliminate a requirement for a public
school or school district to report information or data to another
person or entity. Such a petition must be submitted to the
superintendent of schools of the school district in which the public
school is located or, if the public school is a charter school, the
governing body of the charter school. The petition must:
(a) Clearly identify the requirement to report information or
data that the petitioner is seeking to modify, suspend or eliminate;
(b) Contain a detailed explanation of the reason that the
requirement to report information or data is duplicative or
redundant or does not provide information or data that is used by
the Department, the State Board or any other person or entity to
support educational outcomes; and
(c) Propose an alternative report of information or data, if any,
that would ensure that information and data to support
educational outcomes remains accessible.
3. Upon receipt of a petition submitted pursuant to subsection
2, the superintendent of schools of the school district or governing
body of the charter school, as applicable, shall:
(a) Review the petition to determine whether the requirement
to report data or information that is proposed for modification,
suspension or elimination is duplicative or redundant or does not
provide data or information that is used by the Department, the
-
*AB584*

– 9 –
State Board or any other person or entity to support educational
outcomes.
(b) If the petition requests to modify, suspend or eliminate a
requirement for a public school to report data or information to
the school district and the superintendent of schools of the school
district finds that the requirement to report data or information
proposed for modification, suspension or elimination is duplicative
or redundant or does not provide data that is used by the school
district to support educational outcomes, approve the petition and
issue a decision modifying, eliminating or suspending the
requirement. If the superintendent of schools of the school district
issues such a decision, the superintendent shall provide notice of
the approval of the petition to the petitioner, each public school
within the school district and any other person or entity affected
by the modification, suspension or elimination of the reporting
requirement. If the superintendent of public schools of the school
district denies a petition to modify, suspend or eliminate a
requirement for a public school to report data or information to
the school district, the superintendent shall provide a written
explanation of the reasons for the denial to the petitioner. A
petitioner whose petition is denied pursuant to this paragraph may
submit a request for reconsideration of the denial to the
superintendent of schools of the school district or resubmit the
petition with additional information.
(c) If the petition requests to modify, suspend or eliminate a
requirement for a public school or the school district to report data
or information to any person or entity other than the school
district and the superintendent of schools of the school district
finds that the requirement to report data or information proposed
for modification, suspension or elimination is duplicative or
redundant or does not provide data that is used by the school
district to support educational outcomes, approve the petition and
forward the petition to the Department for consideration pursuant
to subsection 4 or deny the petition and provide a written
explanation to the petitioner of the reasons for the denial of the
petition. A petitioner whose petition is denied pursuant to this
paragraph may submit a request for reconsideration of the denial
to the superintendent of schools or governing body of the charter
school, as applicable, or resubmit the petition with additional
information.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall evaluate
each petition forwarded to the Department pursuant to subsection
3 and, as part of such an evaluation, consider:
(a) Any information provided by the petitioner, including,
without limitation, any statements of support from school
-
*AB584*

– 10 –
leadership, governing bodies, teachers or other educational
personnel;
(b) The necessity of the reporting requirement for compliance
with federal or state law;
(c) Whether the information or data that is reported is
available through other means or reporting mechanisms;
(d) The administrative burden imposed by the reporting
requirement, with a focus on enabling teachers and administrators
to allocate their time efficiently to activities that support pupil
learning; and
(e) The potential impact of the modification, suspension or
elimination of the reporting requirement on transparency, the
accountability of public schools and schools districts for the
quality of schools and the educational achievement of pupils, and
the accessibility of information and data concerning the
educational achievement of pupils.
5. Not later than 180 days after receiving a petition for
evaluation pursuant to subsection 4, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall approve the petition, deny the petition or request
additional information or revisions to the petition. If the
Superintendent requests additional information or revisions to the
petition, the Superintendent shall, not later than 90 days after
receiving such additional information or revisions, approve or
deny the petition.
6. If, after conducting an evaluation of a petition pursuant to
subsection 4, the Superintendent of Public Instruction finds that
the requirement to report data or information proposed for
modification, suspension or elimination is duplicative or
redundant or does not provide data or information that is used by
the Department, the State Board or any other person or entity to
support educational outcomes, the Superintendent may issue an
order modifying, suspending or eliminating the requirement. If the
Superintendent of Public Instruction denies the petition, the
Superintendent shall provide notice of the denial and a written
explanation of the reasons for the denial to the petitioner and the
superintendent of schools of the school district or governing body
of the charter school, as applicable, that forwarded the petition to
the Department pursuant to subsection 3. If the Superintendent of
Public Instruction issues an order modifying, suspending or
eliminating a reporting requirement pursuant to this subsection,
the Superintendent shall:
(a) Provide notice of the order to the petitioner, the
superintendent of schools of the school district or the governing
body of the charter school that forwarded the petition to the
Department pursuant to subsection 3 and any other person or
-
*AB584*

– 11 –
entity affected by the modification, suspension or elimination of
the reporting requirement.
(b) Submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education or, if the Legislature is in session at the time notice
is provided pursuant to paragraph (a), to the Senate and Assembly
Standing Committees on Education, which describes the reporting
requirement modified, suspended or eliminated and any
recommendations for legislation to continue the modification,
suspension or elimination of the reporting requirement after the
expiration of the order.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if, pursuant to
this section, the superintendent of schools of a school district or
the Superintendent of Public Instruction issues a decision or order
modifying, suspending or eliminating a requirement to report data
or information, each person or entity to whom the requirement
applies shall comply with the decision of the superintendent of
schools of the school district or the order of the Superintendent of
Public Instruction, as applicable, until the expiration of the
decision or order. Any decision or order issued pursuant to this
section expires on July 1 of the next odd-numbered year following
its issuance.
8. The superintendent of schools of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall report to the
Department in a standardized format prescribed by the
Department any information required by the Department to
complete the reporting of information required by subsection 9
concerning petitions submitted by teachers and school
administrators pursuant to subsection 2.
9. The Department shall include in a report submitted on or
before February 1 of each odd-numbered year to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature:
(a) Information concerning the participation of teachers and
school administrators in the process to request the modification,
suspension or elimination of requirements for the reporting of
information or data, including, without limitation, data relating to
petitions submitted by teachers and administrators pursuant to
subsection 2;
(b) A summary of each petition received by the Department
pursuant to this section and the decision of the Superintendent of
Public Instruction on each such petition;
(c) The rationale of the Superintendent for the approval of
each petition that was approved by the Superintendent; and
(d) Any trends or systemic issues identified by the
Superintendent which are related to requirements for a public
-
*AB584*

– 12 –
school or school district to report information or data to another
person or entity.
10. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section. The State Board may adopt regulations
to establish:
(a) A format for a petition submitted pursuant to this section
and procedures for the submission of such a petition;
(b) Criteria for evaluating such a petition;
(c) Procedures to ensure that teachers and school
administrators have input on decisions regarding requirements for
a public school or school district to report information or data to
another person or entity; and
(d) Any other requirements necessary to implement the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. Chapter 385A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 to 7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 3. 1. The Department shall make every effort to ensure
that the statewide system of accountability for public schools
applies uniformly to all school districts in this State and complies
with all requirements for the accountability of public schools,
including, without limitation, requirements for the receipt of
federal money under the Elementary and Secondary Education
Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301 et seq., as amended.
2. The statewide system of accountability for public schools
applies to all school districts in this State, regardless of size or
demographics, and must, except as otherwise provided in
subsection 3 of section 5 of this act:
(a) Include a method to, on an annual basis, rate each school
district based upon the collective performance of the public
schools within the school district and the achievement of district-
wide performance targets established pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability for public schools;
(b) Include a method to implement consequences, rewards and
supports for school districts based upon such ratings, with a focus
on addressing disparities and improving outcomes for historically
underserved populations;
(c) Include a method to provide grants, financial support or
other resources, to the extent that money is available for that
purpose, to school districts receiving one of the two lowest ratings
of performance pursuant to the statewide system of accountability
for public schools; and
(d) Establish district-wide achievement targets and
performance targets for specific groups of pupils, including,
without limitation, pupils who are economically disadvantaged,
-
*AB584*

– 13 –
pupils from major racial and ethnic groups, pupils with disabilities
and pupils who are English learners. The district-wide
achievement targets and performance targets must be based on
aggregated metrics from the public schools within the school
district, including, without limitation, measurements of the
progress and proficiency of pupils on the examinations
administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
3. The statewide system of accountability for public schools
must:
(a) Ensure that data collected under the system is used to
promote transparency, equity and measureable progress in pupil
achievement in school districts throughout this State;
(b) Provide for the monitoring and oversight of the operations
of, and allocation of resources by, school districts for the purpose
of improving pupil outcomes; and
(c) Establish mechanisms for public reporting on the
performance of each school district, including, without limitation,
accountability metrics and a detailed analysis of the progress of
each school district toward its district-wide achievement targets.
4. In developing the statewide system of accountability for
public schools required by this section, including, without
limitation, the achievement and performance targets for school
districts and the criteria used to rate each school district, the
Department shall meaningfully consult with the parents and
guardians of pupils enrolled in public schools in this State.
5. The Department shall provide technical assistance and
guidance to school districts to support compliance with the
statewide system of accountability for public schools and to
address deficiencies identified through the rating process.
Sec. 4. 1. On or before a date determined by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, but not later than the third
Friday in August of each year, the Department shall determine
whether each school district is meeting the district-wide
achievement targets and performance targets established pursuant
to the statewide system of accountability for public schools.
2. The determination for a school district must be made
pursuant to subsection 1 in consultation with the board of trustees
of the school district and must be based only upon the information
and data for those pupils who are enrolled in the public schools
within the school district for a full academic year. On or before a
date determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, but
not later than the third Friday in August of each year, the
Department shall:
(a) Transmit the determination made for each school district to
the board of trustees of that school district;
-
*AB584*

– 14 –
(b) Transmit the determination made for each school district to
the State Board and the Governor; and
(c) Post on the Internet website maintained by the Department
a report summarizing the determination made for each school
district, including, without limitation, the metrics for measuring
the achievement and performance for each school district.
3. If the number of pupils in a particular group who are
enrolled in a public school in a school district is insufficient to
yield statistically reliable information:
(a) The Department shall not determine that the school district
has failed to meet the performance targets established pursuant to
the statewide system of accountability for public schools based
solely upon that particular group.
(b) The pupils in such a group must be included in the overall
count of pupils enrolled in the public schools in the school district
and who took the examinations administered pursuant to
NRS 390.105.
 The Department shall use the mechanism approved by the
United States Department of Education for the statewide system of
accountability for public schools for determining the number of
pupils that must be in a group for that group to yield statistically
reliable information.
4. If an irregularity in testing administration or an
irregularity in testing security occurs at one or more public
schools in the school district and the irregularity invalidates the
test scores of pupils, such test scores must be included in the
aggregate of scores reported for the school district, the attendance
of those pupils must be counted toward the total number of pupils
who took the examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105
and the pupils must be included in the total number of pupils who
were required to take the examinations. The determination made
pursuant to subsection 1 for a school district must reflect any such
irregularity and describe the impact of any such irregularity on
the determination.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Irregularity in testing administration” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 390.255.
(b) “Irregularity in testing security” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 390.260.
Sec. 5. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
based upon the determinations made by the Department pursuant
to section 4 of this act, the Department shall, on or before a date
determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction but not
later than the third Friday in August of each year, issue a
-
*AB584*

– 15 –
preliminary rating for each school district in accordance with the
statewide system of accountability for public schools.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
(a) Before making a final rating for a school district, the
Department shall provide the school district an opportunity to
review the data upon which the preliminary rating is based and to
present evidence or corrections. The Department shall notify the
board of trustees of the school district of the opportunities
provided pursuant to this paragraph and provide a reasonable
period within which to present evidence or corrections pursuant to
this paragraph.
(b) After considering any evidence or corrections submitted by
a school district within the reasonable period prescribed by the
Department pursuant to paragraph (a), the Department shall, on
or before a date determined by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction but not later than the third Friday in September of
each year, make a final determination concerning the rating for
the school district.
3. The Department may temporarily waive or otherwise pause
the requirement to make ratings for school districts that comply
with 20 U.S.C. § 6311(c) pursuant to this section if the United
States Department of Education grants a waiver from or otherwise
pauses the requirements of 20 U.S.C. § 6311(c).
4. On or before a date determined by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction but not later than the third Friday in September
of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Post on the Internet website maintained by the Department
the determinations and final ratings made for all school districts
in this State, which must be presented in a clear and
understandable format; and
(b) Submit a report summarizing the determinations and final
ratings made for all school districts in this State, including,
without limitation, detailed data and information on the district-
wide performance of each school district and compliance with
state accountability standards, to:
(1) The Governor;
(2) The State Board; and
(3) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education
and the next regular session of the Legislature.
Sec. 6. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction:
(a) Shall designate a school district as a low-performing
school district if:
(1) The Department has determined that the school district
has failed to meet the district-wide achievement targets and
-
*AB584*

– 16 –
performance targets established pursuant to the statewide system
of accountability for public schools; or
(2) The school district receives one of the two lowest ratings
of performance pursuant to the statewide system of accountability
for public schools.
(b) May designate a school district as a low-performing school
district if:
(1) The administration of the school district is
characterized by instability or unsatisfactory performance in
leadership, including, without limitation, a dismissal, resignation
or removal of the superintendent of schools of the school district,
that has a significant impact on the operations of the school
district and the educational outcomes for pupils;
(2) The resignation or removal of members of the board of
trustees of the school district results in multiple vacancies that
disrupt the continuity of leadership of the school district and
impacts the ability of the board of trustees to effectively govern the
school district;
(3) The school district experiences an unexpected and
severe financial hardship, including, without limitation, a
financial hardship resulting from financial malfeasance, financial
mismanagement or any other condition, that threatens the fiscal
stability and operational capacity of the school district; or
(4) Based on data and information concerning the
achievement and performance of pupils enrolled in public schools
in the school district, the allocation of resources by the school
district or the availability of educational programs among public
schools in the school district and specific groups of pupils enrolled
in those schools, the school district is characterized by systemic
inequity in educational access, resources or outcomes among
specific groups of pupils, including, without limitation, among
pupils who are economically disadvantaged, pupils from major
racial and ethnic groups, pupils with disabilities and pupils who
are English learners.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate a
school district as an underperforming school district if:
(a) For at least 2 consecutive school years, the Superintendent
has designated the school district as a low-performing school
district pursuant to subsection 1; or
(b) The Superintendent:
(1) Designated the school district as a low-performing
school district pursuant to subsection 1 in the current or the
immediately preceding school year; and
(2) Determines that one or more of the conditions set forth
in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 exist in the school district.
-
*AB584*

– 17 –
Sec. 7. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
designate a public school, other than a public school approved by
the State Board to be rated using the alternative performance
framework prescribed by the State Board pursuant to NRS
385A.730, as a low-performing school if, in at least 2 of the
immediately preceding 3 school years, at least one of the following
criteria apply to the public school:
(a) The public school receives one of the two lowest ratings of
performance pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for
public schools.
(b) The pupils enrolled in the public school demonstrate
proficiency in English language arts and mathematics in the
bottom 20th percentile of statewide performance metrics, as
determined by the Department.
(c) For high schools, the average graduation rate is less than
60 percent for the immediately preceding 3 school years or less
than 70 percent for the immediately preceding 5 school years.
(d) For elementary schools, more than 50 percent of the pupils
enrolled in the elementary school do not achieve adequate
proficiency in the subject area of reading before the completion of
grade 3.
2. On the day that the Department posts on the Internet
website maintained by the Department the determinations and
final ratings made for all public schools in this State pursuant to
NRS 385A.720:
(a) The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department a list of public schools that are
designated as low-performing schools pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Each school district with at least one public school in the
district on the list of public schools that are designated as low-
performing schools pursuant to subsection 1 shall post the list on
the Internet website maintained by the school district; and
(c) The Department shall provide the list of public schools that
are designated as low-performing schools pursuant to subsection 1
to the State Board as part of the report of data provided to the
State Board pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 385A.080.
3. The principal of each public school designated as a low-
performing school shall notify the parents and legal guardians of
pupils enrolled in the public school of the designation of the
public school as a low-performing school and the actions that will
be taken to address the areas of deficiency that caused the
designation. The notice must:
(a) Contain a summary of the data and information
concerning the performance of pupils enrolled in the public
school and the specific areas identified for improvement;
-
*AB584*

– 18 –
(b) Provide information on any available support or resources
for pupils and their families, including, without limitation,
academic and social-emotional resources;
(c) Contain a detailed improvement plan outlining the
measures the public school intends to implement, with clearly
defined goals and timelines for achieving those goals; and
(d) Provide information on alternative educational options
available to pupils residing in the zone of attendance of the public
school, including, without limitation, policies regarding a transfer
to another public school and options available to pupils pursuant
to section 37 of this act, if applicable.
Sec. 8. NRS 385A.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.090 1. On or before [September 30] the date
determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, but not
later than the third Friday in August of each year:
(a) The board of trustees of each school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, each college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education and each city or county that
sponsors a charter school shall provide written notice that the report
required pursuant to NRS 385A.070 is available on the Internet
website maintained by the school district, State Public Charter
School Authority, institution or city or county, if any, or otherwise
provide written notice of the availability of the report. The written
notice must be provided to the:
(1) Governor;
(2) State Board;
(3) Department;
(4) Committee;
(5) Bureau; and
(6) Attorney General, with a specific reference to the
information that is reported pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection
1 of NRS 385A.250.
(b) The board of trustees of each school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, each college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education and each city or county that
sponsors a charter school shall provide for public dissemination of
the annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.070 by posting a copy of the report on the Internet website
maintained by the school district, the State Public Charter School
Authority, the institution or the city or county, if any. If a school
district does not maintain a website, the district shall otherwise
provide for public dissemination of the annual report by providing a
copy of the report to the schools in the school district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, the
residents of the district, and the parents and guardians of pupils
-
*AB584*

– 19 –
enrolled in schools in the district, including, without limitation, each
charter school sponsored by the district. If the State Public Charter
School Authority, the institution, the city or the county does not
maintain a website, the State Public Charter School Authority, the
institution, the city or the county, as applicable, shall otherwise
provide for public dissemination of the annual report by providing a
copy of the report to each charter school it sponsors and the parents
and guardians of pupils enrolled in each charter school it sponsors.
2. Upon the request of the Governor, the Attorney General, an
entity described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or a member of the
general public, the board of trustees of a school district, the State
Public Charter School Authority, a college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education or a city or county that
sponsors a charter school, as applicable, shall provide a portion or
portions of the report required pursuant to NRS 385A.070.
Sec. 9. NRS 385A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.070 must include information on pupil achievement and
school performance, including, without limitation, pupil
achievement for each school in the district and the district as a
whole, including, without limitation, each charter school sponsored
by the district. The board of trustees of the district shall base its
report on the results of the examinations administered pursuant to
NRS 390.105 and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610 and shall compare the results
of those examinations for the school year for which the annual
report is being prepared with those of previous school years. The
report must include, for each school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, and
each grade in which the examinations and assessments were
administered:
(a) The number of pupils who took the examinations and a
record of attendance for the period in which the examinations were
administered, including an explanation of any difference in the
number of pupils who took the examinations and the number of
pupils who are enrolled in the school.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, pupil achievement, reported separately by gender and
reported separately for the groups of pupils identified in the
statewide system of accountability for public schools.
(c) A comparison of the achievement of pupils in each group
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools with the performance targets established for that group.
(d) The percentage of pupils who were not tested.
-
*AB584*

– 20 –
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, the percentage of pupils who were not tested, reported
separately by gender and reported separately for the groups
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
(f) The most recent 3-year trend in pupil achievement in each
subject area tested and each grade level tested pursuant to NRS
390.105 and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610, which may include
information regarding the trend in the achievement of pupils for
more than 3 years, if such information is available.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the rating of each public school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district,
pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
(h) Information on whether each school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, has
made progress based upon the model adopted by the Department
pursuant to NRS 390.125.
(i) Information that compares the results of pupils in the school
district, including, without limitation, pupils enrolled in charter
schools sponsored by the district, with the results of pupils
throughout this State [.] and, where applicable, with the results of
pupils in comparable school districts in other states. The
information required by this paragraph must be provided in
consultation with the Department to ensure the accuracy of the
comparison.
(j) For each school in the district, including, without limitation,
each charter school sponsored by the district, information that
compares the results of pupils in the school with the results of pupils
throughout the school district and throughout this State [.] and,
where applicable, with the results of pupils in schools in
comparable school districts in other states. The information
required by this paragraph must be provided in consultation with the
Department to ensure the accuracy of the comparison.
2. If the Department temporarily waives or otherwise pauses
the requirement to administer examinations that comply with 20
U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2) pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 390.105, the
requirement of subsection 1 to include certain information in the
annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS 385A.070
does not apply for the period of time that such a waiver or pause is
effective.
-
*AB584*

– 21 –
Sec. 10. NRS 385A.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.600 1. The Department shall make every effort to
obtain the approval necessary from the United States Department of
Education to ensure that the statewide system of accountability for
public schools complies with all requirements for the receipt of
federal money under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act
of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301 et seq., as amended.
2. The statewide system of accountability applies to all public
schools, regardless of Title I status, and must, except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3 of NRS 385A.720:
(a) Include a method to, on an annual basis, rate each public
school based upon the performance of the school and based upon
whether each public school meets the school achievement targets
and performance targets established pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability;
(b) Include a method to implement consequences, rewards and
supports for public schools based upon the ratings;
(c) Include a method to provide grants and other financial
support, to the extent that money is available from legislative
appropriation, to public schools receiving one of the two lowest
ratings of performance pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools; and
(d) Establish school achievement targets and performance
targets for public schools and performance targets for specific
groups of pupils, including, without limitation, pupils who are
economically disadvantaged, pupils from major racial and ethnic
groups, pupils with disabilities and pupils who are English learners.
The school achievement targets and performance targets must:
(1) Be based primarily upon the measurement of the progress
and proficiency of pupils on the examinations administered pursuant
to NRS 390.105; [and]
(2) For elementary schools, include the proportion of pupils
demonstrating adequate proficiency in the subject area of reading
in accordance with NRS 392.748 to 392.785, inclusive, and
adequate progress toward achieving such proficiency; and
(3) For high schools, include the rate of graduation and the
rate of attendance.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the statewide system of accountability for public schools
may include a method to:
(a) On an annual basis, rate school districts based upon the
performance of the public schools within the school district and
whether those public schools meet the school achievement targets
and performance targets established pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability; and
-
*AB584*

– 22 –
(b) Implement consequences, rewards and supports for school
districts based upon the ratings.
Sec. 11. NRS 385A.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.750 The Department shall prescribe a form for notice to
parents and guardians concerning the rating of a public school
designated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction as a low-
performing school pursuant to section 7 of this act or the
designation of a school district as a low-performing or
underperforming [.] school district pursuant to section 6 of this act.
Sec. 12. Chapter 386 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 13, 14 and 15 of this act.
Sec. 13. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
place on probation a school district that the Superintendent has
designated as an underperforming school district if the
designation is made pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
section 6 of this act. A period of probation imposed pursuant to
this section must not exceed 2 school years.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify the
board of trustees of a school district that has been designated as
an underperforming school district and that the Superintendent is
placing the school district on probation pursuant to this section.
Upon receipt of such a notice, the board of trustees of the school
district shall:
(a) Direct the superintendent of schools of the school district to
prepare and submit to the Department a school district
performance improvement plan that satisfies the requirements of
subsection 2 of section 15 of this act; and
(b) Prepare and, not later than 90 days after the date of the
notice received pursuant to this subsection, submit to the
Department a school board improvement plan to address
deficiencies in the governance of the school district and support
the implementation of the school district performance
improvement plan prepared pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. During a period of probation imposed pursuant to this
section, if the board of trustees of the school district is required by
subsection 2 of NRS 386.165 to have nonvoting members
appointed to the board, the appointed members become voting
members for the period:
(a) Beginning on the date on which the Superintendent of
Public Instruction notifies the board of trustees pursuant to
subsection 2 that the Superintendent is placing the school district
on probation; and
(b) Ending on the date on which the Superintendent of Public
Instruction terminates the period of probation pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 14 of this act or, if the Superintendent
-
*AB584*

– 23 –
places the school district into a period of state oversight pursuant
to subsection 2 of section 14 of this act, on the date on which any
period of state oversight is terminated pursuant to subsection 10 of
section 14 of this act.
 Any appointed members of a board of trustees who become
voting members of the board of trustees pursuant to this
subsection shall have the same duties, rights and responsibilities
as the elected members of the board.
4. A school board improvement plan prepared pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 must:
(a) Contain a self-assessment by the board of trustees of the
school district of the governance practices of the board that
identifies deficiencies and areas requiring improvement;
(b) Identify specific actions that the board of trustees will take
to improve governance of the school district, including, without
limitation:
(1) A description of clear roles and responsibilities for
members of the board of trustees; and
(2) Strategies for the board of trustees to support
implementation of the school district performance improvement
plan prepared pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2;
(c) Require the members of the board of trustees to complete
training for professional development, in addition to any training
for professional development required by NRS 386.327, in the
areas of school district governance, financial management and
academic accountability;
(d) Include measurable milestones for improving the
governance of the school district and a timeline for achieving
those milestones; and
(e) Include a process for monitoring and publicly reporting
progress on the implementation of the school board improvement
plan.
5. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:
(a) Not later than 30 days after receiving a school board
improvement plan submitted to the Department pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 2, review and approve or deny
approval of the school board improvement plan. If the
Superintendent denies approval of the school board improvement
plan, the Superintendent shall notify the board of trustees of the
school district of the reasons for denying approval of the plan. Not
later than 30 days after receiving such notice, the board of trustees
shall prepare and submit to the Superintendent revisions to the
school board improvement plan. The board of trustees of the
school district shall implement a school board improvement plan
approved by the Superintendent.
-
*AB584*

– 24 –
(b) Monitor the implementation of the school board
improvement plan and the school district performance
improvement plan during the period of probation imposed
pursuant to this section.
(c) Provide technical guidance and support to the board of
trustees to support the implementation of the school board
improvement plan and the school district performance
improvement plan.
(d) Post on the Internet website maintained by the Department,
in the five most common languages other than English primarily
spoken in the households within the school district operating
under the school board improvement plan:
(1) The school board improvement plan approved by the
Superintendent pursuant to this subsection;
(2) Quarterly reports summarizing the progress of the
board of trustees in implementing the school board improvement
plan, including, without limitation, milestones that have been
achieved and areas requiring improvement; and
(3) An annual performance review of the board of trustees
that identifies improvements in governance of the school district
by the board of trustees, deficiencies in such governance and any
recommendations for additional action by the board of trustees to
improve governance of the school district.
6. The board of trustees of a school district operating under a
school board improvement plan shall:
(a) Post on the Internet website of the school district, in the
five most common languages other than English primarily spoken
in the households within the school district:
(1) The approved school board improvement plan, not later
than 10 business days after the board of trustees has received
notice from the Superintendent of Public Instruction of the
approval of the plan; and
(2) Quarterly reports summarizing the progress of the
board of trustees in implementing the school board improvement
plan, including, without limitation, actions taken to improve
governance of the school district, milestones that have been
achieved and actions remaining to be taken under the school
board improvement plan; and
(b) Conduct regular public meetings during the period of
probation imposed pursuant to this section at which the board of
trustees:
(1) Provides updates on the implementation of the school
board improvement plan;
(2) Solicits input from parents and legal guardians of
pupils, teachers, school employees and community stakeholders
-
*AB584*

– 25 –
concerning efforts to improve the governance of the school
district; and
(3) Presents a summary of challenges experienced in
addressing deficiencies in the governance of the school district
and actions planned to address those deficiencies.
Sec. 14. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may
terminate a period of probation imposed on a school district
pursuant to section 13 of this act if, not later than 2 school years
after the commencement of the period of probation, the
Superintendent finds that:
(a) The school district has made adequate progress, as defined
in the regulations adopted by the Superintendent pursuant to
subsection 13, toward meeting the goals and benchmarks
necessary for the school district to no longer be designated as an
underperforming school district pursuant to section 6 of this act;
and
(b) The board of trustees of the school district has made
adequate progress, as defined in the regulations adopted by the
Superintendent pursuant to subsection 13, in implementing the
school board improvement plan such that the school district is not
likely to experience a condition described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of section 6 of this act.
2. If, after implementing a school board improvement plan
for 2 school years, the Superintendent of Public Instruction finds
that:
(a) The school district has failed to make adequate progress, as
defined in the regulations adopted by the Superintendent pursuant
to subsection 13, toward meeting the goals and benchmarks
necessary for the school district to no longer be designated as an
underperforming school district pursuant to section 6 of this act;
or
(b) The board of trustees of the school district has failed to
make adequate progress, as defined in the regulations adopted by
the Superintendent pursuant to subsection 13, in implementing the
school board improvement plan such that the school district is not
likely to experience a condition described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of section 6 of this act,
 the Department may implement targeted oversight measures
pursuant to subsection 3 or initiate state oversight of the
governance and operations of the board of trustees pursuant to
subsection 4.
3. If, pursuant to subsection 2, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction implements targeted oversight measures, the
Superintendent may:
-
*AB584*

– 26 –
(a) Have direct involvement in the processes of decision
making by the board of trustees on matters of governance;
(b) Establish specific governance and operational mandates
for the board of trustees that are designed to improve school
district performance and accountability;
(c) Evaluate and monitor, on an ongoing basis, the
performance of the school district and its adherence to
improvement requirements;
(d) Appoint a state monitor to oversee the activities of the
board of trustees to ensure compliance with state education laws
and regulations; or
(e) Engage in any combination of the actions described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive.
4. If, pursuant to subsection 2, the Department initiates state
oversight of the governance and operations of the board of
trustees, the Governor, not later than 30 days after receiving
notification that the Department has initiated state oversight, may
appoint a state monitor. The state monitor must:
(a) Be a person with expertise in governance, leadership and
management, with a record of improving the outcomes of an
underperforming organization;
(b) Undergo a review by the Department to ensure there are no
conflicts of interest with the school district or board of trustees of
the school district; and
(c) Be compensated by the board of trustees of the school
district at a rate determined by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction. Such compensation must be paid from the budget of
the school district, with any necessary budget adjustments or
augmentations made to accommodate the expenditure in the
current fiscal year or any future fiscal year.
5. If a school district is designated as an underperforming
school district for 5 consecutive school years and the board of
trustees of the school district has failed to make adequate
progress, as defined in the regulations adopted by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subsection 13, in
executing the school board improvement plan, the Superintendent
may take additional measures to ensure that the educational needs
of pupils are met. Such additional measures may include, without
limitation, with the approval of the Governor through an executive
order:
(a) The reassignment of some or all of the powers, roles and
responsibilities of the board of trustees of a school district
pursuant to this chapter to the Superintendent, or his or her
designee, to address chronic underperformance. The specific
powers, roles and responsibilities reassigned must be specified by
-
*AB584*

– 27 –
the Governor in the executive order, upon consultation with the
Superintendent to ensure the reassignment is in alignment with
the school board improvement plan, and may include, without
limitation:
(1) Oversight of financial management and resource
allocation;
(2) Governance and any operational decision-making
authority defined within current policies; and
(3) Implementation of policies and programs to address
identified deficiencies.
(b) The appointment of additional members to the board of
trustees of the school district, as needed, to stabilize the
governance structure and ensure proper expertise is available to
address chronic underperformance. Members appointed pursuant
to this paragraph must:
(1) Possess expertise in governance, education, financial
management or organizational leadership;
(2) Serve for a term specified by the Superintendent, not
exceeding 3 years, with an option for reappointment based on
demonstrated progress; and
(3) Be voting members of the board of trustees.
(c) The establishment of a state management team to assume
governance authority over the operations of the board of trustees
of the school district.
6. Any action taken pursuant to subsection 5 remains in
effect until the Department determines that the board of trustees
has made adequate progress, as defined in the regulations adopted
by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subsection
13, that is sufficient to warrant the termination of state oversight
as specified in subsection 10. Upon the expiration of any action
taken pursuant to subsection 5, any reassigned powers, roles or
responsibilities revert to the elected board of trustees, any
additional members of the board of trustees appointed pursuant to
subsection 5 no longer serve as members of the board of trustees
and the state management team is dissolved.
7. During the period additional measures initiated pursuant
to paragraph (c) of subsection 5 are in effect, the state
management team, under the direction of the Superintendent of
Public Instruction, shall assume the governance responsibilities of
the board of trustees of the school district, including, without
limitation:
(a) Oversight of financial management and resource
allocation;
(b) Governance and any operational decision-making
authority defined within current board policies;
-
*AB584*

– 28 –
(c) Implementation of policies and programs outlined in the
school board improvement plan and school district performance
improvement plan submitted pursuant to section 13 of this act;
and
(d) Engagement with community stakeholders, including,
without limitation, parents, teachers and local officials, to ensure
that intervention efforts address the needs of pupils and the
broader community.
8. The Department shall conduct annual evaluations of the
progress of a school district placed under a state management
team pursuant to subsection 5. If the school district demonstrates
substantial improvement and meets the benchmarks established in
the school district performance improvement plan and the school
board improvement plan submitted pursuant to section 13 of this
act, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may initiate a phased
return to local governance. The phased return must:
(a) Transition authority from the state management team to
the board of trustees in stages, as appropriate;
(b) Be contingent on the board of trustees demonstrating
continued progress under its school board improvement plan; and
(c) Include enhanced monitoring by the Department for a
period of up to 2 years following the completion of the transition
to ensure sustained progress.
9. If the school district fails to make adequate progress, as
defined in the regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction pursuant to subsection 13, under the school district
performance improvement plan submitted pursuant to section 13
of this act or the board of trustees of the school district fails to
fulfill the requirements of its school board improvement plan, the
Superintendent may extend state intervention for up to 3
additional years. This extension must:
(a) Be subject to the approval of the Governor or the
Governor’s designee;
(b) Include an updated set of benchmarks and timelines to
address persistent deficiencies in school district performance and
school board governance; and
(c) Require the continuation or expansion of oversight
measures, including, without limitation, the retention of the state
management team or the appointment of additional support
personnel to address governance or operational deficiencies.
10. State oversight initiated pursuant to this section must be
terminated when the Superintendent of Public Instruction
determines that the school district and the board of trustees of the
school district have achieved measurable and sustained progress
as outlined in the school district performance improvement plan,
-
*AB584*

– 29 –
including, without limitation, improvements in academic
achievement, operational efficiency and equitable resource
allocation, and the school board improvement plan submitted
pursuant to section 13 of this act, including, without limitation,
establishing its ability to effectively oversee and support
improvement efforts for the school district. Upon termination of
state oversight:
(a) The board of trustees shall resume full governance
responsibilities; and
(b) The Department shall provide a final report summarizing
the outcomes of the state oversight period, including, without
limitation, the progress achieved and recommendations for
sustained improvement.
11. For a period of 3 years following the return to local
governance, the Department shall monitor the board of trustees of
the school district concerning compliance with its school board
improvement plan.
12. The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department all reports and evaluations related
to oversight measures implemented pursuant to this section in a
manner that ensures transparency and accountability. A summary
of these actions and outcomes must be provided in an annual
report to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) State Board; and
(c) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is received in the interim period between legislative
sessions; or
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is received during a legislative session.
13. For the purposes of this section, the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall adopt regulations for determining
adequate progress based on criteria which may include, without
limitation:
(a) Implementation of governance strategies and actions
outlined in the approved school board improvement plan,
including, without limitation:
(1) Completion of professional development goals;
(2) Improved decision-making processes that support
district performance objectives;
(3) Active engagement with the community through regular
public meetings and transparent reporting of progress;
-
*AB584*

– 30 –
(4) Compliance with reporting and public engagement
requirements as set forth in this section; and
(5) Achievement of milestones and benchmarks set forth in
the school board improvement plan;
(b) Measurable progress toward benchmarks established in the
school district performance improvement plan submitted pursuant
to section 13 of this act, including, without limitation:
(1) Increased proficiency rates in core academic subjects;
(2) Improved high school graduation rates;
(3) Enhanced operational efficiency and resource
allocation; and
(4) Sustained improvements verified by the Department;
(c) Demonstrated ability of the board of trustees and the school
district to maintain progress without state oversight; and
(d) Continued compliance with state laws and regulations
relating to education.
Sec. 15. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
place on probation a school district that the Superintendent has
designated as an underperforming school district pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of section 6 of this act and notify the
board of trustees of the school district of such placement. A period
of probation imposed pursuant to this section must not exceed 2
school years.
2. Not later than 90 days after being designated as an
underperforming school district, the school district shall prepare
and submit a school district performance improvement plan. The
plan must:
(a) Identify specific areas of academic, operational and
systemic deficiency that contributed to the designation of
underperformance, including, without limitation:
(1) Pupil achievement outcomes in core academic subjects,
including, without limitation, reading, mathematics and science;
(2) Disparities in access to educational resources, programs
and opportunities; and
(3) Inefficiencies in school district operations, leadership
and financial management;
(b) Establish measurable benchmarks for improvement that
are applicable to all grade levels, including, without limitation:
(1) Increased pupil proficiency rates in core academic
subjects, with defined goals for each grade level;
(2) Enhanced attendance and pupil promotion rates at
elementary, middle and high school levels;
(3) Improved high school graduation rates and college and
career readiness indicators, where applicable; and
-
*AB584*

– 31 –
(4) Strengthened operational efficiency and equitable
resource allocation across all schools within the school district;
(c) Outline targeted strategies to achieve the benchmarks
established pursuant to paragraph (b), addressing both academic
and operational challenges, including, without limitation:
(1) Strategies to narrow achievement gaps for identified
underserved groups, including, without limitation, pupils with
special needs, low-income pupils, English language learners and
pupils from diverse racial or ethnic backgrounds;
(2) Comprehensive plans to improve curriculum delivery,
including, without limitation, review and selection of new
curricula, teacher effectiveness, instructional quality and
professional development for teachers;
(3) Initiatives to enhance the leadership, governance
practices, financial oversight and resource allocation of the school
district to ensure alignment with the performance goals of the
school district;
(4) Implementation of evidence-based interventions tailored
to the specific needs of underperforming schools and pupil
populations; and
(5) Programs to increase family and community
engagement in support of pupil learning and school district
improvement efforts;
(d) Include clear timelines, resource requirements and interim
milestones to monitor progress throughout the probationary
period, with regular benchmarks to measure improvement; and
(e) Establish a system for ongoing evaluation and adjustments
to ensure continuous progress, with mechanisms for reporting
progress to the Department and communicating updates to
stakeholders, including, without limitation, families and teachers.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall review and
approve or deny approval of a school district performance
improvement plan submitted pursuant to subsection 2 within 30
days after receipt. If revisions are required, the school district
shall have 30 days to submit a revised plan for approval. Once
approved, the school district shall immediately commence
implementation of the plan.
4. Each school district shall publish its approved school
district performance improvement plan on its official Internet
website within 10 business days after receiving approval from the
Superintendent of Public Instruction. The school district shall
publish quarterly progress updates on its implementation of the
plan, including, without limitation, milestones achieved and areas
requiring additional focus. All published materials must be posted
on the Internet website maintained by the school district and
-
*AB584*

– 32 –
translated into the five most common languages spoken by
families within the school district.
5. The board of trustees of the school district shall hold
regular public meetings during the probationary period to:
(a) Provide updates on the progress of the school district under
the school district performance improvement plan;
(b) Solicit input from parents, teachers and community
stakeholders; and
(c) Present a summary of challenges faced and actions
planned to address deficiencies.
6. During the probationary period, the Department shall
monitor the progress of the school district through:
(a) Quarterly progress reports submitted by the school district;
(b) On-site assessments of the operations, instructional quality
and financial management of the school district; and
(c) Providing technical assistance to address challenges and
support implementation.
7. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may appoint a
state monitor to oversee the adherence of the school district to the
school district performance improvement plan. The state monitor
must:
(a) Be a person with expertise in governance, finance,
operations, leadership or management of a school district, with
demonstrated experience in improving outcomes of an
underperforming organization, or possess expertise in a specific
area, as determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction;
(b) Undergo a review by the Department to ensure there are no
conflicts of interest with the school district or the board of trustees
of the school district; and
(c) Be compensated by the board of trustees of the school
district at a rate determined by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction. Such compensation must be paid from the budget of
the school district, with any necessary budget adjustments or
augmentations made to accommodate the expenditure in the
current fiscal year or any future fiscal year.
8. A state monitor appointed pursuant to subsection 7 shall:
(a) Review quarterly progress reports;
(b) Conduct audits and site visits to evaluate progress in the
implementation of the school district performance improvement
plan;
(c) Provide feedback and recommendations for adjustments to
the school district performance improvement plan; and
(d) Ensure alignment with state educational goals and
expectations.
-
*AB584*

– 33 –
9. At the conclusion of each school year during the
probationary period, the Department shall evaluate the progress of
the school district based on the benchmarks established in the
approved school district performance improvement plan. If the
school district demonstrates adequate progress, as defined in
the regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction pursuant to subsection 15, the school district shall
continue implementation of its school district performance
improvement plan with ongoing monitoring. If the school district
fails to meet established benchmarks, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction may extend the probationary period or implement
escalated intervention measures as set forth in this section.
10. If, after operating under probationary status for 2 school
years, the school district fails to demonstrate adequate progress, as
defined in the regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction pursuant to subsection 15, the Superintendent may:
(a) Replace school district leadership, including, without
limitation, the superintendent of schools of the school district and
key administrative personnel;
(b) Reallocate school district resources to prioritize support for
schools designated as low-performing schools pursuant to section
7 of this act; and
(c) Assume state control over specific school district functions,
including, without limitation, financial management, curriculum
development, school culture, climate structures or instructional
programming, until the school district demonstrates adequate
progress, as defined in the regulations adopted by the
Superintendent pursuant to subsection 15.
11. If state control is assumed pursuant to subsection 10, the
Department shall develop, in collaboration with the school district,
a school district recovery plan. The school district recovery plan
must contain:
(a) Strategies to address deficiencies and improve academic
outcomes, financial management and operational efficiency;
(b) Measurable benchmarks and timelines for recovery; and
(c) Clear accountability measures for monitoring progress.
12. If the school district:
(a) Demonstrates sustained progress and meets the
benchmarks established in the school district recovery plan
developed pursuant to subsection 11:
(1) The school district must be removed from probationary
status;
(2) Full governance responsibilities must be restored to the
leadership of the school district; and
-
*AB584*

– 34 –
(3) The school district shall submit annual progress reports
to the Department for 3 additional years to ensure sustained
improvement.
(b) Fails to demonstrate sustained progress or meet the
benchmarks established in the school district recovery plan within
the specified timeframe, the Department shall conduct a
comprehensive review to identify persistent deficiencies and
barriers to improvement. Based on the findings of the review, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction may take additional actions,
including, without limitation:
(1) Extending state oversight for up to 3 additional years
with revised benchmarks and timelines;
(2) Replacing the superintendent of schools of the school
district or other key administrative personnel directly responsible
for the areas of persistent deficiency;
(3) Implementing targeted operational interventions,
including, without limitation, reallocating resources, adjusting
staffing strategies or revising curriculum frameworks;
(4) Appointing additional state personnel or external
consultants to address specific challenges identified during the
review; and
(5) Evaluating the feasibility of school district
restructuring, including, without limitation, the reorganization
and restructuring of the school district.
13. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction takes any
action authorized pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 12, the
Department shall continue to engage with community
stakeholders, including, without limitation, parents, teachers and
local leaders, to provide regular updates on intervention efforts
and to ensure alignment with the needs of pupils and the broader
community. Any actions taken pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 12, including, without limitation, documentation of the
performance deficiencies of the school district, the steps taken to
address those deficiencies, progress made during the intervention
period and recommendations for additional measures to achieve
sustained improvement, must be reported by the Superintendent to
the:
(a) Governor; and
(b) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is received during the interim period between legislative
sessions.
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is received during a legislative session.
-
*AB584*

– 35 –
14. The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department all reports and evaluations related
to the intervention measures taken pursuant to this section and
include such measures in an annual report to the:
(a) Governor; and
(b) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is received during the interim period between legislative
sessions.
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is received during a legislative session.
15. For the purposes of this section, the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall adopt regulations for determining
adequate progress based on criteria which may include, without
limitation:
(a) Measurable improvements in academic achievement
metrics, including, without limitation:
(1) Increased proficiency rates in core academic subjects;
(2) Improved high school graduation rates, where
applicable;
(3) College and career readiness indicators, where
applicable; and
(4) Enhanced attendance, promotion and retention rates
across all grade levels;
(b) Enhanced operational efficiency and equitable resource
allocation, demonstrated by:
(1) The effective and efficient allocation of resources;
(2) Strengthened financial management practices; and
(3) Evidence of improved instructional quality and program
delivery throughout the school district;
(c) Sustained progress verified by the Department through
periodic evaluations, including, without limitation:
(1) Adherence to benchmarks and milestones set forth in
the approved school district performance improvement plan and, if
necessary, the school district recovery plan; and
(2) Implementation of evidence-based strategies that
address the root causes of underperformance; and
(d) Compliance with state laws and regulations relating to
education, including, without limitation, requirements for
transparency, public reporting and stakeholder engagement.
Sec. 16. NRS 386.790 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.790 1. As provided in this title, the board of trustees of
any school district may furnish transportation for all resident
children of school age in the school district attending a public
-
*AB584*

– 36 –
school, including pupils assigned to special schools or programs
pursuant to NRS 388.417 to 388.469, inclusive, or 388.5251 to
388.5267, inclusive:
(a) Who are not excused from school attendance by the
provisions of this title; and
(b) Who reside within the school district at such a distance from
the school as to make transportation necessary and desirable.
2. When the board of trustees of a school district whose
population is less than 100,000 furnishes transportation for pupils
attending public schools pursuant to subsection 1, the board may
also provide transportation for all resident children of school age in
the school district attending private schools not operated for profit,
over bus routes established for pupils attending public schools. If
such transportation is provided, the pupils attending such private
schools must be transported, if space is available, to and from the
points on the established routes nearest to the schools which they
attend.
3. The board of trustees of any school district may:
(a) Establish bus routes.
(b) Make regulations governing the conduct of pupils while
being transported.
(c) For the safety of pupils being transported, govern the
conduct of drivers by making and enforcing regulations not
inconsistent with regulations of the State Board of Education or with
law.
4. Except as otherwise provided in section 23 of this act, the
board of trustees of a school district that furnishes transportation
pursuant to this section may elect not to provide transportation to
pupils who attend a public school outside the zone of attendance
that the pupil is otherwise required to attend if the pupil is
attending the public school pursuant to paragraph (f) of
subsection 2 of NRS 388.040 and section 22 of this act.
Sec. 17. Chapter 387 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Excellence in Education Account is hereby created in
the State Education Fund. The Excellence in Education Account
must be administered by the Department.
2. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Excellence in Education Account, after deducting any applicable
charges, must be credited to the Account.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
balance in the Excellence in Education Account must not exceed
$30,000,000. Each fiscal year, the Director of the Office of
Finance shall adjust the maximum balance in the Excellence in
Education Account specified in this subsection by multiplying the
-
*AB584*

– 37 –
maximum balance in the Account calculated pursuant to this
subsection for the immediately preceding fiscal year by the rate of
inflation, as defined in NRS 387.12455.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if, at the end
of a fiscal year, the combined total of the balance in the Education
Stabilization Account, the ending fund balance in each county
school district fund, any reserve funds held by schools within each
county school district and the unrestricted reserve funds of charter
schools, including, without limitation, unrestricted reserve funds
within networks of charter schools, exceeds 20 percent of the total
of all appropriations and authorizations from the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, for the
immediately preceding fiscal year, money must be transferred to
the Excellence in Education Account in the following order of
priority:
(a) Any money that would otherwise remain in the State
Education Fund pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 387.1213
because the balance in the Education Stabilization Account has
reached the limit established in subsection 3 of NRS 387.1213
must be transferred to the Excellence in Education Account.
(b) Any money that would otherwise be transferred from a
county school district fund to the Education Stabilization Account
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 387.1213 but is not transferred to
the Education Stabilization Account because the balance in the
Education Stabilization Account has reached the limit established
in subsection 3 of NRS 387.1213 must be transferred to the
Excellence in Education Account.
(c) Any interest earned on the money in the Education
Stabilization Account pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 387.1213
must be transferred to the Excellence in Education Account.
5. Once the balance in the Excellence in Education Account
reaches the amount of the maximum balance in the Excellence in
Education Account determined pursuant to subsection 3, any
money described in subsection 4 must be distributed in the manner
prescribed by NRS 387.1213.
6. Money transferred pursuant to subsection 4 to the
Excellence in Education Account is a continuing appropriation
solely for the purpose of authorizing the expenditure of the
transferred money for the purposes set forth in this section.
7. The money in the Excellence in Education Account may be
used only to award grants to school districts, charter schools and
university schools for profoundly gifted pupils to provide
nonrecurring financial incentives, including, without limitation,
bonuses or financial awards, to teachers, school administrators
and other educational personnel who demonstrate high
-
*AB584*

– 38 –
performance and significant contributions to pupil achievement
and school improvement. If the board of trustees of a school
district or the sponsor of a charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils has established a program to pay
incentives to teachers or school administrators pursuant to section
59 or 60 of this act, or both. Money in the Excellence in Education
Account must be granted to the boards of trustees of such school
districts and the sponsors of charter schools or university schools
for profoundly gifted pupils to pay incentives under the program.
Eighty-five percent of the money in the Excellence in Education
Account must be designated to pay incentives to teachers, and 15
percent of the money in the Excellence in Education Account
must be designated to pay incentives to school administrators.
Money in the Excellence in Education Account, or money from a
grant awarded from the Excellence in Education Account, may
not be used to pay recurring expenses or administrative expenses.
8. On or before November 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Department shall prepare a report concerning grants awarded
pursuant to subsection 7 and submit the report to the Governor,
the State Board and the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the next regular session of the
Legislature.
Sec. 18. NRS 387.1213 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1213 1. The Education Stabilization Account is hereby
created in the State Education Fund. Except as otherwise provided
in this section [,] and section 17 of this act, each year after the close
of the previous fiscal year and before the issuance of the State
Controller’s annual report, each county school district shall transfer
from the county school district fund to the Education Stabilization
Account any amount by which the actual ending fund balance of the
county school district fund exceeds 16.6 percent of the total actual
expenditures for the fund. [The] Except as otherwise provided in
section 17 of this act, the interest and income earned on the money
in the Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be
credited to the Account.
2. Money transferred pursuant to subsection 1 to the Education
Stabilization Account is a continuing appropriation solely for the
purpose of authorizing the expenditure of the transferred money for
the purposes set forth in this section.
3. The balance in the Education Stabilization Account must not
exceed 20 percent of the total of all appropriations and
authorizations from the State Education Fund, excluding the
Education Stabilization Account, for the immediately preceding
fiscal year. Any money transferred to the Education Stabilization
-
*AB584*

– 39 –
Account which exceeds this amount must instead be transferred to
the State Education Fund.
4. If the Interim Finance Committee finds that:
(a) Upon submission of a request from the Department, the
actual enrollment growth for a fiscal year exceeds the projected
enrollment growth by an amount that the Interim Finance
Committee determines would make a transfer of money to the State
Education Fund necessary to fund the excess enrollment;
(b) The collection of revenue in any fiscal year will result in the
State Education Fund receiving less money than authorized for
expenditure from the State Education Fund;
(c) Upon submission of a request from the Department, any
amount of money which was deposited in the State Education Fund
is found by an audit to have been deposited in error; [or]
(d) Upon submission of a request from the Department, any
error in the application of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan by the
Department has created a shortfall in the State Education Fund [,] ;
or
(e) Upon submission of a request from the Department, the
Department is required to undertake extraordinary measures to
oversee or allocate resources to a school district that is designated
as a low-performing school district or underperforming school
district pursuant to section 6 of this act or a public school that is
designated as a low-performing school pursuant to section 7 of
this act or as persistently underperforming pursuant to subsection
6 of section 28 of this act,
 the Committee shall by resolution establish an amount of money
to transfer from the Education Stabilization Account to the State
Education Fund and direct the State Controller to transfer that
amount to the State Education Fund. The State Controller shall
thereupon make the transfer.
5. When determining the actual ending fund balance for the
purposes of subsection 1, each county school district shall exclude:
(a) Any money deposited in the county school district fund on or
before June 30, 2020;
(b) Any money apportioned to the county school district for
capital projects or debt service pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
362.170 and deposited in the county school district fund when
authorized by law; and
(c) Any money transferred to the county school district and
authorized for expenditure as a continuing appropriation pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 6 of NRS 387.1214.
6. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that
the money due from the State Education Fund to a county school
district, charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
-
*AB584*

– 40 –
pupils pursuant to NRS 387.185 exceeds the amount of money
available in the State Education Fund because of a delay in expected
receipts, he or she may request from the Director of the Office of
Finance a temporary advance from the Education Stabilization
Account for the payment of such money due. Upon receipt of such a
request, the Director of the Office of Finance shall make a
recommendation to the Interim Finance Committee to approve the
temporary advance in whole or in part or to deny the request. If the
Interim Finance Committee approves the request in whole or in part,
the Director of the Office of Finance shall notify the State Controller
and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
of the amount approved by the Interim Finance Committee, and the
State Controller shall draw his or her warrant upon receipt of such a
notice of approval. Any money which is temporarily advanced from
the Education Stabilization Account pursuant to this subsection
must be repaid by August 31 following the end of the fiscal year in
which the temporary advance is made.
7. [The] Except as otherwise provided in section 17 of this
act, the balance remaining in the State Education Fund, excluding
the balance remaining in the Education Stabilization Account, that
has not been committed for expenditure on or before June 30 of an
odd-numbered fiscal year must be transferred to the Education
Stabilization Account to the extent that such a transfer would not
cause the balance in the Education Stabilization Account to exceed
the limit established in subsection 3.
Sec. 19. NRS 387.1214 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1214 1. After a direct legislative appropriation is made to
the State Education Fund from the State General Fund pursuant to
NRS 387.1212, the Legislature shall determine the statewide base
per pupil funding amount for each fiscal year of the biennium,
which is the amount of money expressed on a per pupil basis for the
projected enrollment of the public schools in this State, determined
to be sufficient by the Legislature to fund the costs of all public
schools in this State to operate and provide general education to all
pupils for any purpose for which specific funding is not
appropriated pursuant to paragraph (a), (b) , (c) or [(e)] (f) of
subsection 2 or NRS 387.122. It is the intent of the Legislature that
the statewide base per pupil funding amount for any fiscal year, to
the extent practicable, be not less than the statewide base per pupil
funding amount for the immediately preceding fiscal year, adjusted
by the rate of inflation, unless the amount of money contained in the
State Education Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization
Account, decreases from the preceding fiscal year. If the amount of
money contained in the State Education Fund, excluding the
Education Stabilization Account, decreases from the preceding
-
*AB584*

– 41 –
fiscal year, it is the intent of the Legislature that a proportional
reduction be made in both the statewide base per pupil funding
amount and the weighted funding appropriated pursuant to
paragraph [(e)] (f) of subsection 2.
2. After a direct legislative appropriation is made to the State
Education Fund from the State General Fund pursuant to NRS
387.1212, the money in the State Education Fund, excluding any
amount of money in the Education Stabilization Account, must be
appropriated as established by law for each fiscal year of the
biennium for the following purposes:
(a) To each school district, an amount of money determined to
be sufficient by the Legislature, when combined with any other
resources available for this purpose, to provide food services [and
transportation] for pupils and any other similar service that the
Legislature deems appropriate.
(b) To each school district and charter school authorized
under its charter contract, as defined in NRS 388A.015, to offer
transportation for pupils, an amount of money determined to be
sufficient by the Legislature, when combined with any other
resources available for this purpose, to provide transportation for
pupils.
(c) To each school district, charter school or university school
for profoundly gifted pupils, an amount of money determined to be
sufficient by the Legislature, when combined with any other
resources available for this purpose, to provide local funding to
support pupils with disabilities.
[(c)] (d) To each school district, an amount of money
determined to be sufficient by the Legislature, when combined with
any other resources available for this purpose, to provide adjusted
base per pupil funding for each pupil estimated to be enrolled in the
school district.
[(d)] (e) To each charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, an amount of money determined to be
sufficient by the Legislature, when combined with any other
resources available for this purpose, to provide:
(1) The statewide base per pupil funding amount for each
pupil estimated to be enrolled full-time in a program of distance
education provided by the charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils; and
(2) Adjusted base per pupil funding for each pupil estimated
to be enrolled in the charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils other than a pupil identified in
subparagraph (1).
[(e)] (f) To each school district, charter school or university
school for profoundly gifted pupils, an amount of money determined
-
*AB584*

– 42 –
to be sufficient by the Legislature, when combined with any other
resources available for this purpose, to provide additional weighted
funding for each pupil estimated to be enrolled in the school district,
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils who
is:
(1) An English learner;
(2) An at-risk pupil; or
(3) A gifted and talented pupil.
3. The adjusted base per pupil funding appropriated pursuant to
paragraph [(c)] (d) of subsection 2 for each school district must be
determined by applying the cost adjustment factor established
pursuant to NRS 387.1215 which applies to the school district and
the attendance area adjustment established pursuant to NRS
387.1218 which applies to each applicable area of the school district
to the statewide base per pupil funding amount.
4. The adjusted base per pupil funding appropriated pursuant to
subparagraph (2) of paragraph [(d)] (e) of subsection 2 for each
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils must
be determined by applying the cost adjustment factor established
pursuant to NRS 387.1215 which applies to the charter school or
university school and, if applicable, the attendance area adjustment
established pursuant to NRS 387.1218 to the statewide base per
pupil funding amount.
5. The weighted funding appropriated pursuant to paragraph
[(e)] (f) of subsection 2 must be established separately for each
category of pupils identified in that paragraph and expressed as a
multiplier to be applied to the statewide base per pupil funding
amount determined pursuant to subsection 1. A pupil who belongs
to more than one category of pupils or for whom a school district,
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils is
eligible to receive the statewide multiplier pursuant to NRS 387.122
must receive only the weighted funding for the single category to
which the pupil belongs which has the largest multiplier or the
statewide multiplier, whichever is larger. It is the intent of the
Legislature that, to the extent practicable:
(a) The multiplier for each category of pupils for any fiscal year
be not less than the multiplier for the immediately preceding fiscal
year unless:
(1) The amount of money contained in the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, decreases
from the preceding fiscal year, in which event it is the intent of the
Legislature that a proportional reduction be made in both the
statewide base per pupil funding amount and the weighted funding
appropriated pursuant to paragraph [(e)] (f) of subsection 2; or
-
*AB584*

– 43 –
(2) The amount of money contained in the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, increases
from the preceding fiscal year but in an amount which, after funding
the appropriations required by paragraphs (a) to [(d),] (e), inclusive,
of subsection 2, is insufficient to fund the multiplier for each
category of pupils, in which event it is the intent of the Legislature
that the remaining money in the State Education Fund be used to
provide a multiplier for each category of pupils which is as close as
practicable to the multiplier for the preceding fiscal year;
(b) The recommendations of the Commission for the multiplier
for each category of pupils be considered and the multiplier for one
category of pupils may be changed by an amount that is not
proportional to the change in the multiplier for one or more other
categories of pupils if the Legislature determines that a
disproportionate need to serve the pupils in the affected category
exists; and
(c) If the multipliers for all categories of pupils in a fiscal year
are increased from the multipliers in the immediately preceding
fiscal year, a proportional increase is considered for the statewide
base per pupil funding amount.
6. For any money identified in subsection 4 of NRS 362.170
which is deposited to the credit of the State Education Fund:
(a) The amount of such money for the county from which the
money was collected that does not exceed the total amount of
money appropriated pursuant to subsection 2 to the county school
district is deemed to be the first money appropriated pursuant to
subsection 2 for that county school district and the first money spent
by that county school district from the county school district fund
during the applicable fiscal year.
(b) The amount of such money for the county from which the
money was collected which exceeds the total amount of money
appropriated pursuant to subsection 2 to the county school district
must be transferred to the county school district and is hereby
authorized for expenditure as a continuing appropriation for the
purpose of mitigating the adverse effects of the cyclical nature of
the industry of extracting and processing minerals on the ability of
the county school district to offer its pupils a reasonably equal
educational opportunity.
7. The weighted funding appropriated pursuant to paragraph
[(e)] (f) of subsection 2:
(a) May not be used to settle or arbitrate disputes between a
recognized organization representing employees of a school district
or the governing body of a charter school and the school district or
governing body or to settle any negotiations; and
-
*AB584*

– 44 –
(b) May not be used to adjust the district-wide schedules of
salaries and benefits of the employees of a school district.
8. As used in this section, “rate of inflation” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 387.12455.
Sec. 20. NRS 387.12463 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
387.12463 1. The Commission shall:
(a) Provide guidance to school districts and the Department on
the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
(b) Monitor the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan and make any recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education that the Commission determines would,
within the limits of appropriated funding, improve the
implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan or correct any
deficiencies of the Department or any school district or public
school in carrying out the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
(c) Review the statewide base per pupil funding amount, the
adjusted base per pupil funding for each school district and the
multiplier for weighted funding for each category of pupils
appropriated by law pursuant to NRS 387.1214 for each biennium
and recommend any revisions the Commission determines to be
appropriate to create an optimal level of funding for the public
schools in this State, including, without limitation, by
recommending the creation or elimination of one or more categories
of pupils to receive additional weighted funding. If the Commission
makes a recommendation pursuant to this paragraph which would
require more money to implement than was appropriated from the
State Education Fund in the immediately preceding biennium,
the Commission shall also identify a method to fully fund the
recommendation within 10 years after the date of the
recommendation.
(d) Review the laws and regulations of this State relating to
education, make recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education for any revision of such laws and
regulations that the Commission determines would improve the
efficiency or effectiveness of public education in this State and
notify each school district of each such recommendation.
(e) Review and recommend to the Department revisions of the
cost adjustment factors for each county established pursuant to NRS
387.1215 and the method for calculating the attendance area
adjustment established pursuant to NRS 387.1218.
(f) Review the academic progress made by pupils in each public
school since the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan, including, without limitation, any changes to the academic
progress of such pupils as the result of any additional money
-
*AB584*

– 45 –
provided to each such school by the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
In performing such a review, the Commission shall:
(1) Use metrics to measure the academic achievement of
pupils which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of graduation of pupils from high school by
type of diploma;
(II) The performance of pupils on standardized
examinations in math, reading and science;
(III) The number of credentials or other certifications in
fields of career and technical education earned by pupils;
(IV) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on an
advanced placement examination;
(V) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on an
international baccalaureate examination;
(VI) The percentage of pupils in each school who lack a
sufficient number of credits to graduate by the end of their 12th
grade year;
(VII) The percentage of pupils in each school who drop
out;
(VIII) The number of pupils who enroll in higher
education upon graduation;
(IX) The number of pupils who enroll in a vocational or
technical school or apprenticeship training program;
(X) The attendance rate for pupils;
(XI) The number of violent acts by pupils and
disciplinary actions against pupils; and
(XII) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(2) Use metrics to measure the improvement of pupils
enrolled in elementary school in literacy which include, without
limitation:
(I) The literacy rate for pupils in the first, third and fifth
grades;
(II) The number of pupils in elementary school who were
promoted to the next grade after testing below proficient in reading
in the immediately preceding school year, separated by grade level
and by level of performance on the relevant test;
(III) The number of schools that employ a licensed
teacher designated to serve as a literacy specialist pursuant to NRS
388.159 and the number of schools that fail to employ and designate
such a licensed teacher; and
(IV) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(3) Use metrics to measure the ability of public schools to
hire and retain sufficient staff to meet the needs of the public
schools which include, without limitation:
-
*AB584*

– 46 –
(I) The rate of vacancies in positions for teachers, support
staff and administrators;
(II) The attendance rate for teachers;
(III) The retention rate for teachers;
(IV) The number of schools and classrooms within each
school in which the number of pupils in attendance exceeds the
designed capacity for the school or classroom;
(V) The number of classes taught by a substitute teacher
for more than 25 percent of the school year; and
(VI) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(4) Use metrics to measure the extent to which schools meet
the needs and expectations of pupils, parents or legal guardians of
pupils, teachers and administrators which include, without
limitation:
(I) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
school employees;
(II) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
pupils, parents or legal guardians of pupils and graduates; and
(III) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(5) Identify the progress made by each school, school district
and charter school on improving the literacy of pupils enrolled in
elementary school;
(6) Make recommendations for strategies to increase the
efficacy, efficiency, transparency and accountability of public
schools; and
(7) Make recommendations to the Department, school
districts and charter schools to improve the reporting, tracking,
monitoring, analyzing and dissemination of data relating to pupil
achievement and financial accountability, including, without
limitation, revisions to the metrics identified in subparagraphs (1) to
(4), inclusive.
(g) Review and consider strategies to improve the accessibility
and ensure the equitability of existing and new programs for pupils
within and between public schools, including, without limitation,
open zoning.
(h) Review the process and evaluate alternatives for adjusting
funding allocations based on weighted pupil enrollment group
counts to determine the most effective approach for ensuring
equitable and stable funding. The review must include, without
limitation:
(1) An evaluation of quarterly, annual and multi-year
averaging methods for pupil enrollment counts;
(2) An analysis of the impact of such averaging methods on
funding stability, program implementation and equity across
-
*AB584*

– 47 –
school districts, charter schools and university schools for
profoundly gifted pupils;
(3) Consolidation of stakeholder feedback regarding
funding predictability and administrative efficiency; and
(4) Exploration of alternative approaches, including,
without limitation, the use of a 3-year average or 3-year high
count, to balance accuracy and stability in funding streams.
2. Each school district and each charter school shall submit a
quarterly report to the Commission that identifies how funding from
the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan is being used to improve the
academic performance and progress of pupils and includes, without
limitation, all data or metrics collected by the school district or
charter school to demonstrate such improvement. The Commission
shall review the reports submitted pursuant to this subsection and
transmit the reports, along with any commentary or
recommendations relating to the reports, to the Governor, the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education and the Interim Finance
Committee.
3. After receiving the reports submitted to the Commission
pursuant to subsection 2, the Governor may, with the approval of the
Legislature or Interim Finance Committee if the Legislature is not in
session, direct a school district or charter school to take such
remedial actions as the Governor determines to be necessary and
appropriate to address any deficiency identified in the reports
submitted pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The Commission shall:
(a) Present any recommendations pursuant to paragraphs (a) to
[(g),] (h), inclusive, of subsection 1 at a meeting of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education for consideration and
recommendations by the Committee; and
(b) After consideration of the recommendations of the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education, transmit the
recommendations or a revised version of the recommendations to
the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the Legislature.
Sec. 21. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 22 to 38, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 22. 1. Each school district shall implement a system of
open enrollment for school districts in this State pursuant to which
a pupil in a school district may attend any public school in that
school district, regardless of the zone of attendance in which the
pupil resides. The Department shall oversee the transition to a
system of open enrollment for school districts in this State by
-
*AB584*

– 48 –
providing school districts with guidance, support and resources to
ensure pupils and their parents or legal guardians are informed of
the option to participate in the system of open enrollment. The
provision of guidance, support and resources pursuant to this
subsection may include, without limitation, the creation of a
centralized system for the selection of public schools to facilitate
the application, ranking and enrollment process for pupils
throughout the State.
2. Each school district shall adopt a uniform methodology for
calculating the capacity of each public school within the school
district for the purposes of open enrollment. The methodology
must be documented, applied consistently across all public schools
within the school district and made available on the Internet
website maintained by the school district. The calculation of the
capacity of each public school within the school district for the
purposes of open enrollment:
(a) Must be finalized and published on the Internet website
maintained by the school district not later than 90 days before the
beginning of an open enrollment period pursuant to this section;
and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, after the
capacity of a public school is published pursuant to paragraph (a),
must not be reduced for that open enrollment period unless a
significant change occurs that was unforeseeable at the time the
capacity was determined, including, without limitation, a
significant change in capacity caused by any issue with the
facilities of the public school. If such a change occurs, the school
district shall post on the Internet website maintained by the school
district an updated capacity calculation, with a written explanation
of the change, not less than 15 days before the date that
enrollment decisions are made pursuant to this section.
3. Not later than October 15 of each year, the Department
shall issue guidelines for school districts to use to establish a
process for open enrollment for the following school year, which
is to be managed by each school district.
4. On or before January 15 of each year, each public school
shall report to the school district in which it is located the number
of pupils by grade who plan to remain enrolled in the public
school in the following school year. Based on the information
reported to a school district pursuant to this subsection and the
capacity of each public school, on or before March 31 of each
year, the school district shall:
(a) Calculate the number of spots available for open
enrollment in each grade in each public school in the school
district; and
-
*AB584*

– 49 –
(b) Post on the Internet website maintained by the school
district the number of available spots in each grade in each public
school in the school district and take such other actions as are
reasonably calculated to notify parents or legal guardians of
pupils in the school district of that information.
5. Not later than April 15 of each year, the parent or legal
guardian of a pupil in the school district may, through a
centralized system managed by the school district, apply for the
pupil to attend a public school in the school district, other than the
public school for the zone of attendance in which the pupil resides,
by selecting three public schools in the school district for potential
enrollment by the pupil, ranked in order of preference. If a school
district receives more applications for a public school than there
are spots available in a grade in the public school, the school
district shall conduct a transparent two-tiered lottery to allocate
the spots in that grade in the public school. Such a lottery must
prioritize pupils as follows:
(a) Pupils zoned to attend a public school designated as a low-
performing school pursuant to section 7 of this act receive first
priority to fill the available spots at the requested schools.
(b) After accommodating pupils zoned to attend low-
performing schools, any remaining spots are made available to all
other pupils in the school district.
6. Not later than May 1 of each year, each school district
shall notify each parent or legal guardian of a pupil who
submitted an application pursuant to subsection 5 whether the
pupil will be offered a placement at a public school other than the
public school for the zone of attendance in which the pupil resides.
On or before May 15 of each year, the parent or legal guardian
may accept the placement. If the parent or legal guardian does not
accept the placement or does not respond within the required time
period, the pupil must be enrolled in the public school for the zone
of attendance in which the pupil resides.
7. All placements of pupils made pursuant to this section
must be made not later than July 15 of each school year.
8. Notwithstanding any provision of this section, a pupil with
a disability who has an individualized education program must be
able to attend a public school that is able to provide all
accommodations and services necessary to meet the requirements
outlined in the individualized education program.
Sec. 23. 1. In accordance with this section, each school
district shall provide transportation services, or subsidize
transportation services, for pupils who:
-
*AB584*

– 50 –
(a) Are currently attending or zoned to attend a public school
designated as a low-performing school pursuant to section 7 of
this act; and
(b) Apply and are selected to attend a public school in the same
school district that has received one of the three highest ratings of
performance pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for
public schools.
2. To the extent feasible, a school district shall comply with
subsection 1 by directly providing transportation services to
transport a pupil to and from the public school that the pupil is
selected to attend through the use of school buses or other
transportation services provided through a contract entered into
with the school district. If it is not feasible for a school district to
provide such direct transportation services, the school district shall
provide a transportation subsidy to the parent or legal guardian of
the pupil to assist with the cost of transporting the pupil to and
from the public school that the pupil is selected to attend, which
may be used to pay the cost of public transportation, carpool
expenses or other verified costs of transporting the pupil to and
from the public school that the pupil is selected to attend.
3. A subsidy for transportation services provided pursuant to
subsection 2 by a school district to the parent or legal guardian of
a pupil must be:
(a) In an amount not more than 200 percent of the
average per-pupil transportation cost of the school district for
the immediately preceding fiscal year, as determined by the
transportation expenditures of the school district for the
immediately preceding fiscal year;
(b) Distributed monthly or quarterly to the parent or legal
guardian of the pupil; and
(c) Based on the reported transportation expenses of the
parent or legal guardian of the pupil or a flat rate determined by
the school district.
4. To the extent practicable and to the extent of available
resources, each school district shall provide or coordinate
transportation options for pupils, other than pupils for whom the
school district is required by this section to provide transportation
services or a subsidy for transportation services, who are attending
a public school outside the zone of attendance in which the pupil
resides.
Sec. 24. 1. The Department, in collaboration with school
districts, shall:
(a) Monitor the implementation and outcomes of the system of
open enrollment implemented pursuant to section 22 of this act,
including, without limitation, verifying that pupils transferring
-
*AB584*

– 51 –
from a public school designated as a low-performing school
pursuant to section 7 of this act are receiving priority placement
and opportunities to attend a public school that has received a
higher rating of performance pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools; and
(b) Collect data to evaluate the effectiveness of the system of
open enrollment and to identify areas of improvement.
2. Data collected by the Department pursuant to subsection 1
must include, without limitation:
(a) Enrollment trends, including, without limitation, pupil
mobility across public schools and school districts;
(b) Pupil demographics, with a focus on racial and ethnic
diversity, socioeconomic status and other relevant characteristics;
and
(c) Academic outcomes for pupils, with a focus on outcomes
particularly for pupils transferring from a public school
designated as a low-performing school.
3. On or before October 1 of each year, each school district
shall submit to the Department all data necessary for the
Department to prepare an annual report on the outcomes of the
system of open enrollment implemented pursuant to section 22 of
this act, including, without limitation, the date described in
subsection 2. The annual report prepared by the Department
pursuant to this subsection must include, without limitation:
(a) The number of pupils attending or zoned to attend public
schools designated as low-performing schools pursuant to section
7 of this act who successfully transferred to or enrolled in a public
school that received a higher rating of performance pursuant to
the statewide system of accountability for public schools;
(b) The impact of open enrollment on overall pupil
performance, with a focus on pupils transferring from public
schools designated as low-performing schools pursuant to section
7 of this act; and
(c) An analysis of equity of access to high-performing public
schools to determine if all pupils, regardless of background, have
fair access to higher-performing public schools.
4. On or before November 1 of each year, the Department
shall submit the report prepared pursuant to subsection 3 to the:
(a) Governor; and
(b) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is submitted in an odd-numbered year; or
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is submitted in an even-numbered year.
-
*AB584*

– 52 –
5. On or before November 1 of each year, the Department
shall present the report prepared pursuant to subsection 3 to the
State Board. Based on findings in the report, the Department shall
collaborate with school districts to implement adjustments to the
system of open enrollment implemented pursuant to section 22 of
this act to enhance equitable access, improve pupil outcomes and
uphold the priority placement system for pupils transferring from
a public school designated as a low-performing school.
Sec. 25. 1. The Empowering Parents Account is hereby
established in the State Education Fund. Each fiscal year,
$1,000,000, or such greater amount as may be appropriated by the
Legislature for this purpose must be transferred from the State
Education Fund to the Account. The interest and income earned
on the money in the Account, after deducting any applicable
charges, must be credited to the Account. The Account must be
administered by the Department.
2. The Department may accept gifts and grants of money
from any source for deposit in the Empowering Parents Account.
3. Money remaining in the Empowering Parents Account
does not revert to the State General Fund at the end of a fiscal
year, and the balance in the Account must be carried forward to
the next fiscal year.
4. Money transferred pursuant to subsection 1 to the
Empowering Parents Account is a continuing appropriation solely
for the purpose of authorizing the expenditure of the transferred
money for the purposes set forth in this section.
5. The money in the Account may only be used to make
distributions of money to school districts for the purpose of
making grants pursuant to section 26 of this act to assist parents
or legal guardians of pupils in paying the expenses of literacy
intervention, tutoring and other related services for a pupil
required by NRS 392.760 to be provided school intervention
services and intensive instruction in reading.
Sec. 26. 1. Each school district shall use the money
distributed to the school district from the Empowering Parents
Account pursuant to section 25 of this act to establish a Parent-
Selected Intervention Options Program in the school district. The
purpose of the Program is to make grants of money to assist
parents or legal guardians of pupils in paying the expenses for
literacy intervention, tutoring and other related services for a pupil
required by NRS 392.760 to be provided school intervention
services and intensive instruction in reading.
2. A school district shall:
-
*AB584*

– 53 –
(a) Engage a person to administer the Program established
pursuant to subsection 1 and ensure compliance with the
requirements of the Program; and
(b) Establish a process for the parent or legal guardian of a
pupil to apply for a grant of money under the Program, which
must include, without limitation, a process to verify:
(1) That the pupil is required by NRS 392.760 to be
provided school intervention services and intensive instruction in
reading;
(2) The adjusted gross income of the household of the
pupil, which may be established through a federal income tax
return or any other means to verify income determined to be
acceptable by the school district; and
(3) That the pupil and the parent or legal guardian of the
pupil are residents of this State, which may be established through
presentation of a federal income tax return with a Nevada address,
military orders indicating the transfer of the parent or legal
guardian to a military assignment in this State, a Nevada driver’s
license or identification card, proof of enrollment of the pupil in a
public school in this State or any other proof of residency
determined to be acceptable by the school district.
3. A school district shall prioritize the awarding of grants
under the Program established pursuant to subsection 1 in the
following order:
(a) To the parent or legal guardian of a pupil who resides in a
household with an adjusted gross income of $60,000 per year or
less;
(b) To the extent that any money remains available under the
Program after the award of grants pursuant to paragraph (a), to
the parent or legal guardian of a pupil who resides in a household
with an adjusted gross income of more than $60,000 per year but
not more than $75,000 per year; and
(c) To the extent that any money remains available under the
Program after the award of grants pursuant to paragraphs (a) and
(b), to the parent or legal guardian of a pupil who resides in a
household with an adjusted gross income of $75,000 per year or
more.
4. Money awarded to a parent or legal guardian of a pupil
pursuant to subsection 3 must be used only to pay a service
provider registered with the school district pursuant to section 27
of this act for literacy intervention, tutoring and other related
services for a pupil required by NRS 392.760 to be provided school
intervention services and intensive instruction in reading, and
must not be used to pay for any service which the school district is
otherwise required or has agreed to provide at no cost to the pupil
-
*AB584*

– 54 –
or the parent or legal guardian of the pupil. The literacy
intervention, tutoring and related services eligible for payment
under this section are limited to support in reading and English
language arts not otherwise provided or funded by the school
district, and do not include counseling, occupational therapy,
physical therapy, behavioral therapy or other services not specific
to reading, unless the school district does not already provide or
fund such services for the pupil.
5. Each school district shall submit an annual report to the
Department concerning the award of grants under the Program
established pursuant to subsection 1. The report must include,
without limitation:
(a) The amount of money awarded under the Program;
(b) The adjusted gross income of each household receiving a
grant of money under the Program;
(c) A list of the service providers registered with the school
district to provide literacy intervention, tutoring and other related
services under the Program; and
(d) The outcomes for pupils who participate in the Program.
6. The provisions of this section must not be construed to
authorize a school district to discontinue or reduce any required
service to which a pupil is entitled under federal or state law,
including, without limitation, an individualized education program
under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.
§§ 1400 et seq.
7. As used in this section, “adjusted gross income” means the
adjusted gross income of a household for the purposes of federal
income taxation or, if income is established through means other
than a federal income tax return, the equivalent of adjusted gross
income for the purposes of federal income taxation.
Sec. 27. 1. The Department shall develop, publish and
maintain a list of service providers who:
(a) Are in good standing with the Secretary of State; and
(b) Offer literacy intervention, tutoring and other related
services that:
(1) Are evidence-based;
(2) Align with the standards of content and performance
for English language arts adopted by the State Board; and
(3) Align with state literacy goals, standards and guidelines.
2. To be eligible to provide literacy intervention, tutoring or
related services that are eligible expenses under a Parent-Selected
Intervention Options Program established pursuant to section 26
of this act, a service provider must register with the school district
in the county in which pupils to whom the service provider will
-
*AB584*

– 55 –
provide such services are located. A school district shall register
such a service provider if the school district verifies:
(a) That the service provider is in good standing with the
Secretary of State; and
(b) The literacy intervention, tutoring and other related
services offered by the service provider:
(1) Are evidence-based;
(2) Align with the standards of content and performance
for English language arts adopted by the State Board; and
(3) Align with state literacy goals, standards and guidelines.
Sec. 28. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
place on probation each public school that has been designated as
a low-performing school pursuant to subsection 1 of section 7 of
this act. A period of probation imposed pursuant to this section:
(a) Begins on the first day of the first school year following the
date of the designation of the public school as a low-performing
school; and
(b) Must end on the date on which the Department posts a
final rating of the public school made pursuant to NRS 385A.720
that the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines to
indicate that the public school no longer qualifies for designation
as a low-performing school pursuant to subsection 1 of section 7
of this act.
2. Not later than 60 days after the beginning of a period of
probation imposed pursuant to subsection 1, the principal of the
public school shall prepare and submit to the Department a school
improvement plan. The school improvement plan must include,
without limitation:
(a) Specific achievement targets and performance targets to
address the reason that the public school was designated as a low-
performing school;
(b) A clear timeline for implementing any changes to address
the reason that the public school was designated as a low-
performing school; and
(c) A strategic plan for improving pupil outcomes.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, not later
than 30 days after receiving a school improvement plan submitted
to the Department pursuant to subsection 2, review and approve or
deny approval of the school improvement plan. If the
Superintendent of Public Instruction denies approval of the school
improvement plan, the Superintendent shall notify the principal of
the public school of the reasons for denying approval of the plan.
Not later than 30 days after receiving such notice, the principal
shall prepare and submit to the Department revisions to the school
improvement plan. The public school shall implement a school
-
*AB584*

– 56 –
improvement plan approved by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction and post the approved school improvement plan on the
Internet website maintained by the public school.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may appoint an
independent school improvement official to oversee the progress of
a public school during a period of probation imposed pursuant to
this section. The Superintendent may remove or replace an
independent school improvement official at any time, and the
Superintendent shall, not later than 30 days after removing or
replacing an independent school improvement official, provide
notice of such removal or replacement to the principal of the
public school for which the independent school improvement
official was appointed. An independent school improvement
official:
(a) Must not have any conflict of interest that may affect his or
her ability to monitor objectively the school improvement plan of
the public school;
(b) Must possess a background in evaluating school
improvement practices, assessing effective school strategies and
supporting the development of school improvement plans; and
(c) Must be compensated by the public school that was placed
in a period of probation or the school district in which that public
school is located, at a rate established by the Superintendent
before the appointment of the independent school improvement
official.
5. An independent school improvement official appointed for
a public school pursuant to subsection 4 shall:
(a) Monitor the implementation by the public school of the
school improvement plan and the adherence of the public school
to the plan;
(b) Conduct quarterly assessments to evaluate the performance
of pupils and the progress of the public school in achieving the
performance targets established for the public school;
(c) Provide guidance and resources, including, without
limitation, professional development and support for teachers and
leadership training; and
(d) Submit annual progress reports to the Superintendent of
Public Instruction that provide detailed information on the
improvements in the public school and any challenges
encountered.
6. Upon the conclusion of a period of probation for a public
school imposed pursuant to this section or 2 years after a public
school is placed on probation pursuant to this section, whichever
is earlier, the Department shall evaluate the progress of the public
school in meeting the achievement targets and performance
-
*AB584*

– 57 –
targets that address the reason that the public school was
designated as a low-performing school, as specified in the school
improvement plan for the public school. If the Department
determines that the public school has not met such achievement
targets and performance targets, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall:
(a) Designate the public school as persistently
underperforming; and
(b) Notify the principal of the public school and the school
district of the designation of the public school as persistently
underperforming and include in such notice a summary of the
deficiencies causing the designation and any required actions.
7. If, pursuant to subsection 6, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction designates a school as persistently underperforming,
the Superintendent may:
(a) Extend the period of probation of the public school for 1
additional school year, including, without limitation, extending all
requirements and oversight imposed during a period of probation
imposed pursuant to this section;
(b) Implement any or all of the corrective measures described
in sections 29 to 36, inclusive, of this act; or
(c) Require additional state-directed interventions tailored to
address the specific deficiencies preventing the public school from
meeting its achievement targets and performance targets.
Sec. 29. 1. If, pursuant to subsection 6 of section 28 of this
act, the Superintendent of Public Instruction designates a public
school as persistently underperforming, the Superintendent may,
if the school is a local school precinct pursuant to NRS 388G.500
to 388G.810, inclusive, suspend or modify any applicable site-
based decision-making powers granted to the local school
precinct, and may initiate a process for state intervention to
implement one of the following corrective measures:
(a) Replacement of the principal of the public school and other
key personnel of the public school as necessary to support
substantial improvements in leadership and instructional quality;
(b) Direct management of the public school by the Department
to ensure accountability and the implementation of effective
school practices;
(c) Transfer of management of the public school to the city in
which the public school is located or, if the public school is located
in an unincorporated area of a county, transfer management of
the public school to the county;
(d) Conversion of the public school to a charter school that is
sponsored by a sponsor approved by the Department; or
-
*AB584*

– 58 –
(e) Conversion of the public school to an innovation school
pursuant to this section and section 34 of this act.
2. To initiate the process of implementing a corrective
measure described in subsection 1, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall issue a request for letters of interest from eligible
entities to provide information on the process for selecting the
corrective measure. The following entities are eligible entities that
may submit a letter of interest in response to such a request:
(a) A charter management organization, as defined in NRS
388A.020, that:
(1) Is in good standing under each charter contract into
which the charter management organization has entered to
operate a charter school in this State; or
(2) Does not operate a charter school in this State, but has
a demonstrable record of academic success and has the
qualifications necessary to operate a charter school in this State.
(b) An educational management organization, as defined in
NRS 388A.030, that:
(1) Is in good standing under each contract into which the
educational management organization has entered to provide
support or operations to a charter school in this State; or
(2) Does not provide support or operations to a charter
school in this State but has a demonstrable record of academic
success and has the qualifications necessary to provide support or
operations to a charter school in this State.
(c) A sponsor of one or more charter schools.
(d) A city or county that is interested in assuming direct
management of the public school.
(e) Teachers and administrators employed at the public school,
if the request for letters of interest indicates that conversion of the
public school to an innovation school pursuant to section 34 of
this act is a potential corrective measure and at least two such
persons submit a joint letter of interest in response to the request.
3. Not later than 60 days after the close of the period for
receiving letters of interest submitted pursuant to subsection 2, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit a proposal for a
corrective measure to the Governor. The proposal for a corrective
measure must include, without limitation:
(a) A detailed rationale explaining why the selected corrective
measure is anticipated to result in improved pupil outcomes; and
(b) A comprehensive implementation plan outlining the
specific steps required to execute the corrective measure
effectively.
-
*AB584*

– 59 –
4. The Governor, or the Governor’s designee, shall review the
proposal for a corrective measure submitted pursuant to
subsection 3 and take one of the following actions:
(a) Approve the proposal, in which case the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall proceed to implement the approved
corrective measure as provided in sections 29 to 36, inclusive, of
this act; or
(b) Deny the proposal, in which case the Superintendent shall:
(1) Address the reasons for the denial of the proposal; and
(2) Not later than 30 days after the denial of the proposal,
submit to the Governor a revised proposal for the corrective
measure or submit to the Governor a proposal for a different
corrective measure.
5. A corrective measure must be selected, approved and
implemented not later than December 31 of the year in which the
school is designated as persistently underperforming.
6. Each corrective measure must be established with an
initial term of 6 years. During the initial term of the corrective
measure, the Department shall:
(a) Monitor the progress of the school through the program of
accountability and statewide system of accountability for public
schools as set forth in chapter 385A of NRS; and
(b) Provide technical assistance, professional development and
resources as necessary to support the successful implementation of
the corrective measure.
7. At least 1 year before the end of the initial 6-year term of a
corrective measure, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
conduct a comprehensive review of the performance of the public
school for which the corrective measure was implemented to
determine the appropriate next steps. Based on this review, the
Superintendent shall recommend one of the following actions:
(a) Renew the corrective measure for an additional term of not
more than 10 years, if the public school has demonstrated
sustained progress but has not met or exceeded its achievement
targets and performance targets;
(b) Extend the corrective measure indefinitely, if the public
school has met or exceeded its achievement targets and
performance targets or the Superintendent determines that such
action is in the best interest of the pupils and community served by
the public school;
(c) Initiate an alternative or modified corrective measure set
forth in subsection 1; or
(d) Transition the public school back to its original
governance structure within the school district in which the public
school is located, if the school has achieved sustained
-
*AB584*

– 60 –
improvement and the school district demonstrates capacity to
maintain progress.
8. In cases where a corrective measure is extended
indefinitely pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 7:
(a) The Department shall conduct periodic evaluations, not
less often than every 5 years, to assess the performance and
operational effectiveness of the public school and the alignment of
the public school with state educational goals; and
(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction retains the
authority to modify or terminate the corrective measure if
subsequent evaluations reveal significant deficiencies or if the
Superintendent determines that an alternative governance
structure would better serve the pupils enrolled in the public
school.
9. The Department shall prepare a report of the findings and
determinations resulting from the comprehensive review
conducted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to
subsection 7. The report must be posted on the Internet website
maintained by the Department and must include, without
limitation:
(a) A summary of the progress of the public school during the
initial term of the corrective measure;
(b) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the corrective
measure in addressing the deficiencies in the performance of the
public school; and
(c) A detailed rationale for the recommended next steps,
including, without limitation, any proposed changes to the
governance, operations or accountability structure of the public
school.
10. The provisions of this section must not be construed to
prohibit or supersede a sponsor of a charter school from taking
any action to enforce a charter contract or any provision of
chapter 388A of NRS.
Sec. 30. 1. If, pursuant to section 29 of this act, the
corrective measure of replacing the principal of a public school
and other key personnel of the public school is implemented for a
public school designated as persistently underperforming, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall direct the
superintendent of schools of the school district in which the school
is located or, if the public school is a charter school, the governing
body of the charter school, to initiate the process to replace the
principal and other key personnel.
2. Upon receipt of such direction from the Superintendent of
Public Instruction pursuant to subsection 1, the superintendent of
schools of the school district or governing body of the charter
-
*AB584*

– 61 –
school, as applicable, shall immediately begin a process to select a
new principal for the public school. The superintendent of schools
of the school district or governing body of the charter school, as
applicable, shall:
(a) If the public school is a local school precinct, as defined in
NRS 388G.535:
(1) Ensure that the selection process complies with the
applicable provisions of chapter 388G of NRS, including, without
limitation, meaningful participation by the organizational team, as
defined in NRS 388G.540; and
(2) Have the organizational team, as defined in NRS
388G.540, participate in the selection process for the new
principal by:
(I) Defining the desired qualifications and
characteristics of the new principal;
(II) Participating in interviews, evaluations and
deliberations for all candidates to be hired as the new principal;
and
(III) Providing formal recommendations for a candidate
to be hired as the new principal;
(b) Submit the name and qualifications of the final candidate
selected by the superintendent of schools of the school district or
governing body of the charter school, as applicable, for review and
approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to ensure
alignment with the improvement goals for the public school; and
(c) Appoint the new principal to assume full administrative
responsibilities by the start of the next school year.
3. Upon appointment, the new principal, in collaboration
with the administration of the school district or, if the new
principal is the principal of a charter school, the governing body
of the charter school, shall review and, if necessary, replace or
reassign any teacher or other staff member assigned to the school,
subject to the following conditions:
(a) The replacement or reassignment process must comply
with all applicable state and federal laws, including, without
limitation, those related to:
(1) Collective bargaining agreements; and
(2) Employment protections under state and federal law,
including the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
§§ 12101 et seq., and Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42
U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.;
(b) Teachers identified for replacement or reassignment must
receive:
-
*AB584*

– 62 –
(1) Written notification specifying the reasons for the
decision, consistent with performance or other relevant criteria;
and
(2) Support for reassignment to another public school
within the school district, as provided in subsection 6;
(c) All decisions to replace or reassign a teacher must be
documented and reviewed by the administration of the school
district and the Department to ensure compliance with legal and
policy standards; and
(d) Any principal, administrator, teacher or any other staff of
the public school who is replaced must:
(1) Be reassigned within the district to a suitable role in
accordance with chapter 391 of NRS and the policies of the school
district;
(2) Follow the procedures of the school district for
reassignment or other duties as appropriate; and
(3) Abide by any other requirements imposed by law or
policy relating to reassignment.
4. If administrators, teachers or other staff of a public school
are replaced or reassigned pursuant to a corrective measure
implemented pursuant to this section, the superintendent of
schools of the school district, in coordination with the Department,
may establish financial and other incentives, which are not subject
to any collective bargaining agreement, to attract and retain high-
quality teachers, administrators and other staff for the public
school. Such incentives may include, without limitation:
(a) Salary increases, performance-based bonuses and
retention stipends;
(b) Flexible scheduling options to support continuing
education and other professional assignments;
(c) Specialized training programs and career advancement
opportunities; and
(d) Additional supports tailored to address the specific
challenges of the public school.
5. Each allocation of money for an incentive described in
subsection 4 must be:
(a) Approved by the Department;
(b) Limited to the duration of the period for which the
corrective measure is effective pursuant to this section; and
(c) Documented to ensure alignment with the performance and
improvement goals of the public school.
6. A teacher reassigned to another public school within the
school district pursuant to this section must receive support to
meet performance standards, including, without limitation:
(a) Peer mentoring and coaching;
-
*AB584*

– 63 –
(b) Enrollment in professional development programs; and
(c) Additional resources or training as necessary.
7. If a new principal appointed pursuant to this section
determines that additional operational costs are required to
support the improvement goals of the public school, the
superintendent of schools of the school district in which the public
school is located shall:
(a) Evaluate and approve the request if resources are available
or can be made available through reasonable budget
augmentation;
(b) Identify and allocate appropriate sources of funding for the
request; and
(c) Prioritize expenditures to address the most critical needs of
the public school in alignment with its school improvement plan.
8. The Department may provide additional support and
resources to persistently underperforming schools that are
implementing a corrective measure pursuant to this section. Such
support may include, without limitation:
(a) Leadership coaching for new principals and other key
personnel appointed pursuant to this section to ensure effective
school management;
(b) Ongoing professional development opportunities for
teachers to support best practices in instruction and curriculum
delivery; and
(c) Funding to enter into contracts with consultants or
educational specialists to assist in the implementation of effective
school turnaround strategies, ensuring alignment with the
performance improvement goals of the public school.
Sec. 31. 1. If, pursuant to section 29 of this act, the
corrective measure of direct management of the public school by
the Department is implemented for a public school designated as
persistently underperforming, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall assume responsibility for overseeing the
operations of the public school.
2. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction assumes
responsibility for overseeing the operations of a public school
pursuant to subsection 1, the Superintendent shall appoint a
school turnaround director to manage the public school. The
school turnaround director shall:
(a) Exercise full operational control of the public school,
including, without limitation:
(1) Overseeing all instructional, operational and financial
decisions;
(2) Implementing personnel decisions, including, without
limitation, the hiring, reassignment or replacement of
-
*AB584*

– 64 –
administrators, teachers and other staff employed at the public
school in compliance with state and federal law; and
(3) Revising curriculum and instructional strategies to
align with best practices for improving pupil outcomes.
(b) Develop and implement a comprehensive school
turnaround plan. The school turnaround plan must include,
without limitation:
(1) Specific academic and operational benchmarks the
public school must meet during the period of the corrective
measure imposed pursuant to this section;
(2) Evidence-based interventions to address areas of
underperformance;
(3) Strategies to close achievement gaps for underserved
populations of pupils, including, without limitation, pupils with
special needs, low-income pupils, pupils who are English learners
and pupils from diverse racial or ethnic backgrounds;
(4) A detailed timeline for achieving measurable progress
in performance; and
(5) An evaluation of policies prescribed by the school
district to identify any waivers necessary for the effective execution
of the school turnaround plan.
(c) Document all proposed waivers of any policy of the school
district and submit the proposed waivers to the superintendent of
schools of the school district for review and to the Superintendent
of Public Instruction for review and approval.
(d) Provide regular updates to the Superintendent of Public
Instruction and the board of trustees of the school district on the
implementation of the school turnaround plan to ensure
transparency and accountability.
3. The Department shall provide ongoing support to a public
school operating under the corrective measure of direct
management imposed pursuant to this section, including, without
limitation:
(a) Leadership coaching and development programs for the
appointed school turnaround director and school administrators to
ensure effective management and instructional leadership.
(b) Targeted professional development for teachers, including,
without limitation:
(1) Training on evidence-based instructional practices and
strategies for differentiated instruction;
(2) Support for integrating technology into the classroom to
enhance learning outcomes; and
(3) Coaching to improve classroom management and
student engagement.
-
*AB584*

– 65 –
(c) Access to external consultants and educational specialists
with expertise in school turnaround strategies. Any such
consultant or educational specialist shall:
(1) Provide guidance on curriculum development and
instructional planning;
(2) Assist with the implementation of performance
monitoring systems; and
(3) Support the alignment of school operations with the
goals of the school turnaround plan.
(d) Additional funding support, as necessary, to ensure the
successful execution of the school turnaround plan, including,
without limitation, grants for instructional resources, teacher
incentives and other identified needs.
Sec. 32. 1. If, pursuant to section 29 of this act, the
corrective measure of management by the city or county in which
the public school is located is implemented for a public school
designated as persistently underperforming, the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall carry out the transfer of administrative
control as follows:
(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate
the city in which the public school is located, or, if the public
school is not located in a city, designate the county in which the
public school is located, as the local educational agency, as
defined in NRS 391.855, for the public school during the
management period. The designation must:
(1) Grant the city or county, as applicable, full authority
and accountability for the governance, operations and
improvement of the public school; and
(2) Require the city or county to comply with all applicable
state and federal laws and regulations, including, without
limitation, reporting requirements.
(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall assign
administrative control of the public school to the city or county
designated to manage the public school, subject to the
requirements set forth in this section. Such administrative control
includes, without limitation, the appointment by the governing
body of the city or county, as applicable, of a municipal school
director for the public school. The municipal school director shall:
(1) Manage the day-to-day operations of the public school,
including, without limitation, providing financial, instructional
and operational management;
(2) Develop and implement targeted improvement strategies
to address areas of underperformance;
(3) Oversee personnel decisions, including the hiring,
reassignment and replacement of teachers, administrators and
-
*AB584*

– 66 –
other staff employed at the public school, in compliance with state
and federal laws; and
(4) Lead the development and execution of a school
turnaround plan.
2. A city or county assigned administrative control of a public
school pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall, not later
than 60 days after the assignment, ensure that a school
turnaround plan is developed for the public school. The school
turnaround plan must:
(a) Be developed collaboratively by the municipal school
director, school leadership and community stakeholders, with
input from teachers, parents and legal guardians of pupils and the
leadership of the city or county, as applicable;
(b) Include specific academic, operational and equity-focused
benchmarks the public school must meet during the period of
management by the city or county;
(c) Identify evidence-based strategies to improve pupil
outcomes, particularly for underserved populations of pupils;
(d) Establish a clear timeline for achieving measurable
improvements in performance; and
(e) Be submitted to the Superintendent of Public Instruction
for review and approval.
3. The Department shall provide technical assistance and
resources to support a city or county in executing a school
turnaround plan.
Sec. 33. 1. If, pursuant to section 29 of this act, the
corrective measure of conversion to a charter school is
implemented for a public school designated as persistently
underperforming, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, in
consultation with an entity that is authorized to sponsor charter
schools pursuant to NRS 388A.220, shall carry out the process to
convert the public school to a charter school as follows:
(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall issue a
request for qualified operators of charter schools and charter
school sponsors to submit applications to convert the public school
into a charter school.
(b) Any operator of charter schools applying to convert the
public school into a charter school must demonstrate the capacity
to address the specific needs of the public school, including,
without limitation, evidence-based strategies to improve academic
outcomes and operational efficiency.
(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall confer with
the State Public Charter School Authority or any other entity that
is authorized to sponsor charter schools pursuant to NRS
388A.220 to evaluate the qualifications of each applicant to
-
*AB584*

– 67 –
convert the public school into a charter school, including, without
limitation, an assessment of the applicant’s record of improving
academic performance and organizational effectiveness.
2. Once a qualified applicant to operate the charter school
has been selected pursuant to subsection 1, the designated sponsor
of the charter school must adhere to the procedures set forth in
NRS 388A.270 to 388A.285, inclusive, for the formation of a
charter contract. The resulting charter school is subject to all
provisions of this chapter and chapter 388A of NRS and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
3. The charter school that results from the conversion must
operate under the oversight of the designated sponsor of the
charter school, which shall monitor and regulate the performance
of the charter school in accordance with the approved charter
contract. At a minimum, the charter contract must establish:
(a) Specific academic, operational and financial performance
expectations and metrics;
(b) Methods for annual evaluation and ongoing accountability
of the charter school; and
(c) Intervention procedures and possible sanctions if the
charter school fails to meet the performance requirements in the
charter contract.
4. The operator of the converted charter school shall develop
a comprehensive school turnaround plan, subject to approval by
the sponsor of the charter school and the Superintendent of Public
Instruction. The turnaround plan must include, without
limitation:
(a) Measurable academic and operational benchmarks tied to
improved pupil performance;
(b) Evidence-based instructional strategies to address learning
gaps, particularly among subgroups of pupils who have been
historically underserved;
(c) Detailed timelines for meeting interim milestones and a
description of how performance will be monitored; and
(d) Strategies to engage families, community members and
relevant stakeholders in supporting pupil success and school
improvement.
5. The sponsor of the converted charter school shall conduct
annual performance evaluations of the charter school to
determine whether the charter school is meeting the benchmarks,
goals and requirements specified in the charter contract. If the
converted charter school fails to meet performance expectations,
the sponsor shall take such actions as are authorized by the
charter contract and by applicable law or regulation, including,
-
*AB584*

– 68 –
without limitation, imposing conditions or requirements to address
deficiencies.
6. The operator of the converted charter school shall submit
quarterly progress reports to the Superintendent of Public
Instruction and to the sponsor of the charter school regarding
academic performance, operational stability and any additional
issues identified by the sponsor or the Department. The
Superintendent shall review these quarterly progress reports to
ensure alignment with state educational objectives and compliance
with any corrective actions or measures.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a converted
charter school remains subject to reversion or closure if it receives
one of the two lowest annual performance ratings for the number
of consecutive school years described in subsection 1 of NRS
388A.300. The sponsor of the charter school shall maintain its
authority and responsibility for monitoring the performance of the
school and for taking appropriate action under NRS 388A.300,
388A.303 and 388A.306, if necessary.
8. The provisions of this section must not be construed to
prohibit or supersede the authority of the sponsor of a charter
school to enforce the provisions of the charter contract or any
provisions of this title pertaining to the oversight, renewal or
revocation of a charter.
Sec. 34. If, pursuant to section 29 of this act, the corrective
measure of conversion to an innovation school is implemented for
a public school designated as persistently underperforming, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall carry out the process to
convert the public school to an innovation school as follows:
1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall issue a
request for a comprehensive school operating plan to be submitted
by the identified innovation school team. The innovation school
team must:
(a) Consist of not less than two teachers or administrators who
are employed at the public school at the time of the designation of
the public school as persistently underperforming and who submit
a joint letter of interest expressing their commitment to improving
pupil outcomes and operational performance at the public school;
and
(b) Meet all of the innovation school authorization and
operating requirements as set forth in section 41 of this act.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall review the
school operating plan submitted by the innovation school team
pursuant to subsection 1 and take one of the following actions:
(a) Approve the plan, thereby authorizing the innovation
school team to develop a formal agreement to operate the school;
-
*AB584*

– 69 –
(b) Request revisions to the plan from and provide written
feedback to the innovation school team and allow 30 days for
resubmission of the revised plan; or
(c) Deny the plan and provide a detailed explanation of the
reasons for denial and any recommendations for addressing
deficiencies.
3. Upon approval of the school operating plan pursuant to
subsection 2, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall enter
into an innovation school agreement with the innovation school
team. The innovation school agreement must:
(a) Grant the innovation school team full operational control
over the innovation school, including the management of
academic, operational and staffing decisions;
(b) Allow for the waiver of state and school district policies
that are not required for public safety or compliance with federal
law;
(c) Specify that employees of the innovation school remain
public employees for the purposes of the benefits of and
participation in the Public Employees’ Retirement System;
(d) Retain the innovation school as part of the school district
while requiring that its performance results be reported
independently from the overall results of the school district;
(e) Establish the funding allocation for the innovation school,
including state and federal funds, as appropriate and where
permitted under federal law;
(f) Set performance goals and accountability metrics for the
innovation school;
(g) Specify the grounds for termination of the agreement,
including, without limitation:
(1) Failure to comply with the terms of the agreement;
(2) Noncompliance with applicable laws;
(3) Failure to adhere to generally accepted fiscal
management principles; or
(4) Failure to meet the educational goals outlined in the
agreement; and
(h) Ensure that the proposed innovation school meets all of the
authorization and operating requirements set forth in section 41 of
this act.
4. The innovation school team and the school district shall
work collaboratively to support the success of the innovation
school. The collaboration must include, without limitation:
(a) Agreements for the provision of necessary services, such as
transportation or maintenance, which the school district shall
provide in a manner consistent with other public schools within
the school district; and
-
*AB584*

– 70 –
(b) Ongoing support from the school district, including,
without limitation, opportunities for professional development and
resource sharing.
Sec. 35. 1. If, pursuant to sections 29 and 34 of this act,
three or more public schools in a school district that serve
adjacent populations of pupils are designated as persistently
underperforming and the corrective measure of conversion to an
innovation school is implemented for those public schools, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction may authorize the schools to
operate as a network of innovation schools. The purpose of a
network of innovation schools is to:
(a) Improve pupil performance and outcomes across member
innovation schools;
(b) Provide member innovation schools with flexibility in the
administration of educational programs and operational practices;
and
(c) Foster innovative approaches to teaching, learning and
resource management.
2. Each innovation school within a network of innovation
schools must:
(a) Meet all requirements pursuant to section 34 of this act,
including, without limitation, the submission, review and approval
of a school operating plan;
(b) Maintain compliance with state and federal laws and
regulations; and
(c) Operate under an individual innovation school agreement
that outlines specific performance goals, accountability metrics
and operational expectations.
3. A network of innovation schools shall establish an
oversight committee composed of:
(a) At least one representative from the innovation school team
of each innovation school within the network;
(b) Additional stakeholders, as determined by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, to ensure broad
representation and effective oversight; and
(c) A designated chair responsible for coordinating the
activities of the network and serving as the primary liaison with
the Department.
4. An oversight committee established pursuant to subsection
3 shall:
(a) Develop and implement a network operational plan to align
resources, strategies and innovations across member innovation
schools;
(b) Monitor the performance of each innovation school within
the network of innovation schools and provide support to ensure
-
*AB584*

– 71 –
compliance with their respective innovation school agreements;
and
(c) Submit an annual progress report to the Department
detailing the overall impact of the network and the performance of
its member innovation schools.
5. The staff of the innovation schools within a network of
innovation schools may pursue unique contracts with collective
bargaining units serving employees of the innovation schools if:
(a) More than 75 percent of all staff members of the
innovation schools within the network vote in favor of pursuing
such contracts; and
(b) Any agreements reached are consistent with applicable
state and federal laws.
6. If at least 66 percent of schools within a network of
innovation schools meet the performance goals specified in their
innovation school agreements, the innovation schools within the
network may submit a proposal to the Superintendent of Public
Instruction for a nonprofit entity to permanently oversee the
operations of the network. The nonprofit entity shall, for the
innovation schools within the network:
(a) Fulfill all legal and compliance requirements necessary to
be recognized as a local educational agency, as defined in NRS
391.855, under federal and state laws;
(b) Assume full responsibility for operational support,
coaching, accountability and compliance with applicable laws
relating to education, including, without limitation, the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et
seq., and the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, 20 U.S.C. §§
6301 et seq.; and
(c) Manage state and federal funding allocations, reporting
requirements and other functions of a local educational agency to
ensure continued compliance and success.
7. The Department shall monitor the progress of a network of
innovation schools through:
(a) Annual evaluations to assess the effectiveness of the
network operational plan and the performance of member
innovation schools; and
(b) Reviews of the activities of the oversight committee to
ensure alignment with the goals of the network of innovation
schools.
8. Each network of innovation schools shall present
biennially a report to the State Board providing information on the
impact of their innovations on pupil outcomes and sharing best
practices to support system-wide improvements across this State.
-
*AB584*

– 72 –
Sec. 36. 1. If, pursuant to section 29 of this act, the
corrective measure of management by a city or county is imposed
on a public school, the ownership and possession of the facilities
of the public school, including the associated real property,
contents, equipment and supplies, must be transferred as follows:
(a) The city or county, as applicable, shall assume ownership
and possession of the facilities at no cost to the local governmental
entity.
(b) Upon a transfer of ownership and possession of facilities
pursuant to this subsection, the city or county to which the
ownership and possession was transferred shall assume full
responsibility for all operational and maintenance costs associated
with the facilities, including, without limitation:
(1) Routine and preventive maintenance;
(2) Utility costs;
(3) Capital repairs and replacements necessary to ensure
the safety, functionality and sustainability of the facility; and
(4) Compliance with all state and federal laws and
regulations regarding the management and upkeep of public
school facilities.
(c) The transfer of ownership and possession of the facilities
must be formalized through a written transfer agreement between
the Department, the school district and the entity assuming
responsibility for the public school. The transfer agreement must:
(1) State the terms of the transfer, including, without
limitation, the timeline and conditions for the transition of
ownership and possession;
(2) Specify the responsibilities of the new owner or operator
regarding the operation and maintenance of the facilities; and
(3) Include provisions ensuring the continued use of the
facilities as a public educational institution for the benefit of the
community.
(d) The transfer of ownership and possession of the facilities
does not relieve:
(1) The new owner or operator of any obligations related
to:
(I) Providing equitable access to the facilities and
educational programs for all eligible pupils, as required under
state and federal law; and
(II) Maintaining compliance with all applicable public
safety, accessibility and environmental regulations to ensure the
facility meets the needs of the pupils and community it serves.
(2) The previous owner of any obligations relating to the
payment of bonds on the transferred facilities.
-
*AB584*

– 73 –
(e) The Department shall conduct periodic reviews of all
facilities whose ownership and possession is transferred pursuant
to this section to ensure compliance with the terms of the transfer
agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph (c) and alignment
with pupil outcomes and operational benchmarks.
2. If, pursuant to section 29 of this act, the corrective
measure of direct management by the Department or conversion
to a charter school is imposed on a public school, the ownership of
the facilities of the public school, including the associated real
property, contents, equipment and supplies, shall remain with the
school district and the board of trustees of the school district shall
enter into a lease agreement with the Department or the governing
body of the charter school, as applicable, to transfer possession of
such facilities for the use of the Department or the governing body
of the charter school, as applicable, to operate the school. The
lease agreement must provide for no cost to the Department or
charter school, as applicable, except that the lease agreement must
require the Department or charter school, as applicable, to pay a
per-pupil amount to the school district, in an amount negotiated
by the parties to the agreement, to cover the actual direct expenses
of the school district related to the facilities, including, without
limitation, utilities, upkeep of the grounds of the school and
maintenance and repair of the facilities. Nothing in this
subsection prohibits the Department or governing body of the
charter school, as applicable, from negotiating with the board of
trustees of the school district for additional services and the
charges for those services.
3. As used in this section, “actual direct expenses” means
documented, realized expenses incurred by a school district for
specific services or utilities delivered or consumed at facilities that
are subject to a lease agreement entered into pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 37. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
designate a public school designated as a low-performing school
pursuant to section 7 of this act for 3 consecutive school years as a
chronically low-performing school. A pupil who attends or is
scheduled to attend a chronically low-performing school and a
pupil who attends or is scheduled to attend a school classified as
overcrowded by the capacity standards of the school district for 3
consecutive years is eligible to participate in expanded
achievement options pursuant to this section.
2. Eligible pupils may participate in expanded achievement
options by selecting an alternative educational setting from the
following:
-
*AB584*

– 74 –
(a) A public school within the same school district in which the
public school the pupil attends or is scheduled to attend is located
or in another school district, subject to the enrollment policies of
the other school district and the system of open enrollment
implemented pursuant to section 22 of this act.
(b) A charter school, to the extent spaces remain available
after the allocation of available spaces made pursuant to NRS
388A.453 to 388A.462, inclusive.
(c) A private school that:
(1) Meets state performance and accreditation standards;
(2) Is approved by the Department;
(3) Provides instruction in at least the subjects of English
language arts, mathematics, social studies and science and
conducts annual assessments to measure the progress of pupils;
(4) Meets all applicable health and safety requirements and
does not discriminate in admissions based on a category protected
under state or federal law; and
(5) Accepts the state funding allocated for each eligible
pupil pursuant to the requirements of the Nevada Integrity in
Academic Funding Program established pursuant to section 38 of
this act.
3. Any private school that accepts a pupil due to the
designation of the public school the pupil attends or is scheduled
to attend as a chronically low-performing school must provide for
the administration to the pupil of all examinations required by this
State. The examinations must be administered at the public school
from which the pupil transferred or was scheduled to attend, in
accordance with the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
4. To the extent of available funding, for each eligible pupil
requesting to participate in an expanded achievement option
pursuant to this section, the State Treasurer shall deposit an
amount calculated pursuant to this subsection or as otherwise
limited by subsection 6 into a RISE Account established for the
parent of the eligible pupil in accordance with the Nevada
Integrity in Academic Funding Program established pursuant to
section 38 of this act. The amount deposited must include, without
limitation:
(a) An amount equal to 90 percent of the average per-pupil
expenditure of the school district where the public school the pupil
attends or is scheduled to attend is located;
(b) An amount equal to 90 percent of any weighted funding
that would have been designated to the pupil by the school district
where the public school the pupil attends or is scheduled to attend
is located based on the specific educational needs of the pupil; and
-
*AB584*

– 75 –
(c) An amount equal to 90 percent of any applicable
categorical funds that would have been designated to the pupil,
including, without limitation, special education funding, based on
the eligibility of the pupil.
5. The funding allocation amount calculated pursuant to
subsection 4 must not include any state or federal education
funding that cannot be transferred to an expanded achievement
option pursuant to the Nevada Constitution or federal law.
6. If the tuition or cost of participation in an expanded
achievement option is less than the 90-percent funding calculated
pursuant to subsection 4, as adjusted pursuant to subsection 5, the
State Treasurer shall deposit only the amount required to cover
educational expenses associated with the expanded achievement
option to the RISE Account of the pupil.
7. The parents or legal guardians of eligible pupils shall
participate in a ranked-choice enrollment system pursuant to
subsection 8. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
prescribe an annual open enrollment period for such a system. At
the beginning of each open enrollment period, each school district
shall notify the parents or legal guardians of pupils attending
chronically low-performing schools that they are eligible for
expanded achievement options. The notification must include,
without limitation:
(a) Information on available public, charter and private school
options participating in the Nevada Integrity in Academic
Funding Program established pursuant to section 38 of this act;
and
(b) Detailed instructions for applying for expanded
achievement options and, if applicable, requesting transportation
assistance.
8. To apply for an expanded achievement option, the parent
or legal guardian of an eligible pupil must submit an enrollment
application through the expanded achievement options portal of
the school district, listing their preferred schools in ranked order
and requesting any transportation assistance needed.
9. Funding allocations and related support provided pursuant
to this section must be administered in compliance with state and
federal requirements, including, without limitation, the Nevada
Integrity in Academic Funding Program established pursuant to
section 38 of this act, to ensure that resources are appropriately
directed to the selected alternative educational setting supporting
the pupil’s learning needs while fulfilling all legal and fiscal
obligations.
Sec. 38. 1. The State Treasurer, in coordination with the
Department, shall adopt regulations to establish and carry out the
-
*AB584*

– 76 –
Nevada Integrity in Academic Funding Program for the purpose
of allocating money to parents for the payment of the qualified
educational expenses of qualified pupils who participate in an
expanded achievement option pursuant to section 37 of this act.
The intent of the Legislature is that any money appropriated by
the Legislature for the purposes of the Program will not reduce
the statewide base per pupil funding amount determined pursuant
to NRS 387.1214.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must
provide a procedure for a parent to apply to participate in the
Program, criteria for the approval of an application to participate
in the Program, requirements for the establishment of a RISE
Account for a parent for the payment of qualified educational
expenses for a qualified pupil and the manner in which payments
will be made from a RISE Account to a participating entity for the
qualified educational expenses of a qualified pupil. To the extent
that money is available for the purposes of the Program, the State
Treasurer shall establish and administer a RISE Account for each
parent who participates in the Program. The State Treasurer may
allocate not more than 3 percent of the money allocated to the
Program for the expenses of administering the Program and
ensuring compliance with this section.
3. A participating entity that receives a payment from a RISE
Account shall not:
(a) Refund any portion of the payment to the parent on whose
behalf the payment was made. Any refund of the payment for any
item returned or service not provided must be paid to the State
Treasurer for deposit to the RISE Account for the parent.
(b) Rebate to, or share with, a parent or any other person any
portion of the payment.
4. To the extent authorized by federal law, the Department of
Health and Human Services shall not consider money available in
a RISE Account established for a person pursuant to this section
to be income for the purpose of determining eligibility to receive
benefits under Medicaid.
5. Each parent for whom a RISE Account is established
pursuant to this section shall submit an annual report to the State
Treasurer detailing all expenditures from the RISE Account. The
State Treasurer shall examine such reports to ensure compliance
with the provisions of this section. A parent who uses money in a
RISE Account for a purpose other than paying the qualified
educational expenses of a qualified pupil shall repay the amount
of such payments and the State Treasurer may suspend or revoke
the RISE Account of the parent.
-
*AB584*

– 77 –
6. On or before October 1 of each year, the State Treasurer
shall submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education if the report is submitted in an odd-numbered year,
or to the next session of the Legislature if the report is submitted
in an even-numbered year. The report must contain:
(a) The number of qualified pupils and qualified schools
participating in the Program in the immediately preceding fiscal
year;
(b) The total amount of money disbursed under the Program
during the immediately preceding fiscal year;
(c) Academic outcomes of qualified pupils participating in the
Program, as measured by standardized assessment or other
metrics;
(d) A summary of the amount of money used for specialized
services and therapies and the specialized services and therapies
provided; and
(e) Recommendations for improvement of the Program.
7. On or before November 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Department shall submit a report of the impact of the Program on
educational equity and outcomes to the Governor and the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next
session of the Legislature.
8. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Prohibit a parent from paying qualified educational
expenses from sources of money other than a RISE Account.
(b) Limit the independence or autonomy of a participating
entity over its operations, educational programming or
governance.
(c) Make any governmental entity responsible or liable for the
actions or decisions of a participating entity, except as required to
enforce the provisions of this section.
(d) Interfere with the compliance by a participating entity with
any state or federal law or standards for accreditation or licensing.
(e) Constitute an endorsement or approval of any participating
entity or the curriculum, policies or practices of any participating
entity.
(f) Impose additional state oversight or regulatory
requirements other than any requirement explicitly set forth in
this section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Parent” means the parent, custodial parent, legal
guardian or other person in this State who has the legal right to
direct the education of a qualified pupil.
-
*AB584*

– 78 –
(b) “Participating entity” means a natural person or any
governmental agency or political subdivision of a government that
satisfies the criteria established by the Department and the State
Treasurer to be eligible to receive payment from a RISE Account.
The term includes, without limitation:
(1) A qualified school;
(2) A community college, state college or university in this
State which has been approved pursuant NRS 389.160 to offer
dual credit courses or other educational programs to qualifying
pupils;
(3) A provider of specialized services for pupils with
disabilities, including, without limitation, an occupational
therapist, speech-language pathologist, audiologist or behavior
analyst;
(4) A tutor, tutoring facility or other educational service
provider offering academic support approved for the purposes of
the Program;
(5) A vendor of instructional materials, technology and
other educational resources approved for use under the Program;
(6) An organization offering extracurricular activities,
after-school programs and summer educational programs which
are offered by a participating entity; and
(7) A provider of transportation services to enable a
qualified pupil to access an alternative educational setting under
the Program.
(c) “Program” means the Nevada Integrity in Academic
Funding Program established pursuant to this section.
(d) “Qualified educational expenses” means:
(1) Tuition and fees for a qualified pupil to enroll in and
attend a qualified school that is a participating entity;
(2) Textbooks and instructional materials required for a
qualified pupil to enroll in or attend a qualified school that is a
participating entity or to participate in an educational program
offered by a participating entity;
(3) The cost of tutoring or other academic services provided
by a tutor, tutoring facility or educational service provider that is a
participating entity;
(4) Tuition and fees for programs of distance education
that are offered by a participating entity;
(5) Fees for standardized examinations, including, without
limitation, national norm-referenced achievement examinations,
advanced placement tests, college entrance examinations and
similar examinations;
(6) Specialized services for a qualified pupil with a
disability, including, without limitation, the services of an
-
*AB584*

– 79 –
occupational therapist, speech-language pathologist, audiologist
or behavior analyst, that are provided by a participating entity;
(7) Tuition and fees for enrollment in and attendance at an
accredited postsecondary institution that is a participating entity or
any other qualifying educational program offered by a
participating entity;
(8) Fees and costs for a dual credit program, career and
technical education certification or similar postsecondary
educational opportunities offered by a participating entity;
(9) Costs for transportation services necessary for a
qualified pupil to access educational services from a participating
entity, in an amount not to exceed $750 per qualified pupil per
school year;
(10) Contributions to an account established for the
qualified pupil pursuant to the Nevada College Savings Program
set forth in NRS 353B.300 to 353B.370, inclusive;
(11) The cost of educational software, online learning
programs and technology fees necessary for a qualified pupil to
participate in approved programs or courses offered by a
participating entity;
(12) Costs for approved extracurricular activities, after-
school programs and summer educational programs offered by a
participating entity; and
(13) Curriculum or supplemental materials required to
administer the curriculum purchased from a participating entity.
(e) “Qualified pupil” means a pupil who resides in this State
and who:
(1) Is identified as a pupil with a disability under section
504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794;
(2) Is determined by a school district or independent
evaluator to be a pupil with a disability, as defined in
NRS 388.417;
(3) Resides within the zone of attendance of a public school
designated as overcrowded or as a chronically low-performing
school pursuant to section 37 of this act;
(4) Previously participated in the Program or a similar
alternative educational setting;
(5) Is the sibling of a current participant the Program;
(6) Is the child of a parent or legal guardian who is legally
blind, visually impaired, deaf or hard of hearing;
(7) Is the child of a parent who is a member of the Armed
Forces of the United States on active duty or who was killed in the
line of duty;
(8) Resides on qualified tribal land within the boundaries of
this State; or
-
*AB584*

– 80 –
(9) Is in the custody of an agency which provides child
welfare services, as defined in NRS 432B.030.
(f) “Qualified school” means a charter school or private
school that operates as a preschool, elementary school, secondary
school or other educational setting that:
(1) Is located in this State or, if the charter school or
private school serves pupils residing on qualified tribal land within
this State, in an adjacent state within 2 miles of the border of this
State; and
(2) Does not discriminate on the basis of race, color,
religion or national origin.
(g) “Qualified tribal land” means any real property:
(1) For which legal title is vested in, or held in trust for the
benefit of, an Indian tribe or an individual Native American, and
which is subject to restrictions against alienation pursuant to
federal law; and
(2) Over which an Indian tribe exercises governmental
power.
(h) “Resources for Inspiring Student Excellence Account” or
“RISE Account” means an account established and maintained by
the State Treasurer pursuant to this section.
Sec. 39. NRS 388.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.040 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
board of trustees of a school district that includes more than one
school which offers instruction in the same grade or grades may
zone the school district and determine which pupils must attend
each school.
2. The establishment of zones pursuant to subsection 1 does
not preclude a pupil from attending a:
(a) Charter school;
(b) University school for profoundly gifted pupils;
(c) Public school outside the zone of attendance that the pupil is
otherwise required to attend if the pupil is a child in foster care who
is remaining in his or her school of origin pursuant to
NRS 388E.105;
(d) Public school outside the zone of attendance that the pupil is
otherwise required to attend if the pupil has been issued a fictitious
address pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive, or the
parent or legal guardian with whom the pupil resides has been
issued a fictitious address pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471,
inclusive; [or]
(e) Public school outside the zone of attendance that the pupil is
otherwise required to attend if the pupil is an English learner
enrolling in the school pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 388.408 [.] ;
or
-
*AB584*

– 81 –
(f) Public school outside the zone of attendance that the pupil
is otherwise required to attend if the pupil attends a public school
pursuant to the system of open enrollment implemented pursuant
to section 22 of this act.
Sec. 40. NRS 388A.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.220 1. The board of trustees of a school district may
apply to the Department for authorization to sponsor charter schools
within the school district in accordance with the regulations adopted
by the Department pursuant to NRS 388A.105 or 388A.110. An
application must be approved by the Department before the board of
trustees may sponsor a charter school. Not more than 180 days after
receiving approval to sponsor charter schools, the board of trustees
shall provide public notice of its ability to sponsor charter schools
and solicit applications for charter schools.
2. The State Public Charter School Authority shall sponsor
charter schools whose applications have been approved by the State
Public Charter School Authority pursuant to NRS 388A.255. Except
as otherwise provided by specific statute, if the State Public Charter
School Authority sponsors a charter school, the State Public Charter
School Authority is responsible for the evaluation, monitoring and
oversight of the charter school.
3. A college or university within the Nevada System of Higher
Education may submit an application to the Department to sponsor
charter schools in accordance with the regulations adopted by the
Department pursuant to NRS 388A.105 or 388A.110. An
application must be approved by the Department before a college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education may
sponsor charter schools.
4. A city or county may submit an application to the
Department to sponsor charter schools in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to NRS 388A.105
or 388A.110. An application must be approved by the Department
before a city or county may sponsor charter schools. A city or
county:
(a) [May] Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, may
not sponsor a new charter school or allow an existing charter school
sponsored by the city or county to increase enrollment or operate an
additional campus of an existing charter school sponsored by the
city or county if the total number of pupils enrolled in charter
schools sponsored by the city or county is 7 percent or more of the
number of pupils enrolled in public schools in the city or county
other than charter schools that are not sponsored by the city or
county. A city or county may sponsor a new charter school or
allow an existing charter school sponsored by the city or county to
increase enrollment or operate an additional campus of an
-
*AB584*

– 82 –
existing charter school sponsored by the city or county,
notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph, if:
(1) The city or county is located in a school district that has
been designated as a low-performing school district pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 6 of this act; and
(2) The new charter school, increase in enrollment of an
existing charter school or operation of an additional campus of an
existing charter school will serve pupils residing in the zone of
attendance of a public school that is designated as a low-
performing school or persistently underperforming pursuant to
section 7 or 28 of this act, respectively, or that is identified as
overcrowded.
(b) May only sponsor a charter school which is located entirely
within the incorporated area of the city or the unincorporated area of
the county, as applicable.
5. The board of trustees of a school district, a college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city
or county may enter into an agreement with the State Public Charter
School Authority to provide technical assistance and support in
preparing an application to sponsor a charter school and planning
and executing the duties of a sponsor of a charter school as
prescribed in this section.
6. Before a board of trustees of a school district, a college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city
or county that is approved to sponsor charter schools approves an
application to form a charter school, the board of trustees, college or
university or city or county, as applicable, shall prepare, in
collaboration with the Department and, to the extent practicable, the
school district in which the proposed charter school will be located
and any other sponsor of a charter school located in that school
district, an evaluation of the demographic information of pupils, the
academic needs of pupils and the needs of any pupils who are at risk
of dropping out of school in the geographic areas served by the
sponsor.
7. On or before January 31 of each year, the State Public
Charter School Authority shall prepare, in collaboration with the
Department and, to the extent practicable, the board of trustees of
each school district in this State and any other sponsor of a charter
school in this State, an evaluation of the demographic information of
pupils, the academic needs of pupils and the needs of any pupils
who are at risk of dropping out of school in this State.
Sec. 41. Chapter 388G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of a school district may designate a
public school within the school district as an innovation school.
-
*AB584*

– 83 –
The State Public Charter School Authority may designate a
charter school sponsored by the Authority as an innovation
school. The purpose of an innovation school is to implement
innovative educational practices designed to improve pupil
achievement, increase educational equity and address specific
challenges within the public school or community it serves.
2. To be designated as an innovation school, a public school
must develop an innovation plan that:
(a) Identifies specific challenges or barriers to pupil
achievement and proposes evidence-based strategies to address
those challenges or barriers;
(b) Outlines measurable goals and performance benchmarks;
(c) Details the autonomies requested, including, without
limitation, autonomy in any or all of the following:
(1) Curriculum;
(2) Budgeting;
(3) Staffing;
(4) Scheduling; or
(5) Professional development; and
(d) Describes methods for engaging stakeholders, including,
without limitation, teachers, parents and community members in
the development and implementation of the plan.
3. A public school that has developed an innovation plan
pursuant to subsection 2 shall submit the innovation plan to the
board of trustees of the school district or the State Public Charter
School Authority, as applicable. The board of trustees or State
Public Charter School Authority shall review the plan and, if the
plan is satisfactory, designate the public school as an innovation
school.
4. The board of trustees or State Public Charter School
Authority, as applicable, shall subject an innovation school to
heightened measures of accountability to ensure that the proposed
innovations lead to measurable improvements in pupil outcomes.
An innovation school shall provide to the entity that designated the
innovation school an annual progress report that includes,
without limitation:
(a) Performance of pupils on standardized assessments and
other academic benchmarks;
(b) Progress toward goals specified in the innovation plan; and
(c) Stakeholder engagement and satisfaction metrics.
5. The Department may revoke the designation of an
innovation school if the innovation school fails to meet the
performance benchmarks outlined in its innovation plan or does
not comply with applicable laws and regulations.
-
*AB584*

– 84 –
6. A group of innovation schools serving geographically
proximate or thematically aligned populations of pupils may be
designated as an innovation zone by the board of trustees of a
school district or the State Public Charter School Authority, as
applicable. The innovation schools within an innovation zone may
collaborate on shared goals, resources and strategies while
maintaining school-level autonomy as outlined in their respective
innovation plans.
7. The board of trustees of a school district or the sponsor of
a charter school, as applicable, shall ensure that an innovation
school has access to adequate resources to implement effectively
its innovation plan. An innovation school may apply for grants or
other funding opportunities provided by the State or the Federal
Government to support innovative educational practices.
Sec. 42. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent that money is available, the Department shall
establish a pilot program pursuant to which schools selected to
participate in the pilot program integrate science, technology,
engineering and mathematics into instruction in literacy in
kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3.
2. To carry out the pilot program, the Department shall issue
a request for proposals from schools or groups of schools to apply
for a grant of money to integrate science, technology, engineering
and mathematics into instruction in literacy in kindergarten and
grades 1, 2 and 3. In response to such a request for proposals, a
school or group of schools may apply to the Department for such a
grant.
3. In determining whether to approve an application for a
grant submitted pursuant to subsection 2, the Department shall
consider:
(a) The quality of the proposed curricula for a program that
integrates science, technology, engineering and mathematics into
instruction in literacy in kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3;
(b) The proposed instructional strategies; and
(c) The extent to which the approach to instruction is
innovative.
4. Not later than June 1 of the year following the
implementation of the pilot program, a school or group of schools
receiving a grant of money under the pilot program shall submit to
the Department a report that summarizes:
(a) The initial outcomes of the use of the grant received from
the pilot program, including, without limitation, measurable
progress of pupils;
-
*AB584*

– 85 –
(b) Feedback from teachers and administrators at the school
or group of schools who participated in the pilot program; and
(c) Recommendations for the integration of science,
technology, engineering and mathematics into instruction in
literacy in kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3 throughout this
State.
5. The Department shall present the findings of the pilot
program to the State Board, and the Department shall determine
whether to:
(a) Extend the pilot program for an additional year;
(b) Expand the pilot program to additional schools; or
(c) Discontinue the pilot program.
Sec. 43. NRS 389.026 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.026 1. The State Board shall develop a model curriculum
for the subject areas of English language arts and mathematics for
each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive. The
model curriculum for the subject area of English language arts
for each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3 must
include, without limitation, phonics-based instruction and the
integration of science, technology, engineering and mathematics
into instruction in English language arts.
2. The Department shall provide each model curriculum
developed pursuant to subsection 1 to:
(a) The board of trustees of each school district; and
(b) The governing body of each regional training program for
the professional development of teachers and administrators.
3. The Department shall provide to the governing body of each
charter school the model curriculum developed pursuant to
subsection 1 for the grade levels taught at the charter school.
4. The board of trustees of each school district shall make
available to each public school within the school district the model
curriculum for the grade levels taught at the public school.
5. The model curriculum may be used as a guide by teachers
and administrators in developing class lesson plans to ensure
compliance with the academic standards adopted for English
language arts and mathematics.
6. The governing body of each regional training program for
the professional development of teachers and administrators may
use the model curriculum in the provision of training to teachers and
administrators to ensure compliance with the academic standards
adopted for English language arts and mathematics.
Sec. 44. NRS 389.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.520 1. The Council shall:
(a) Establish standards of content and performance, including,
without limitation, a prescription of the resulting level of
-
*AB584*

– 86 –
achievement, for the grade levels set forth in subsection 5, based
upon the content of each course, that is expected of pupils for the
following courses of study:
(1) English language arts;
(2) Mathematics;
(3) Science;
(4) Social studies, which includes only the subjects of
history, geography, economics, civics, financial literacy and
multicultural education;
(5) The arts;
(6) Computer education and technology, which includes
computer science and computational thinking;
(7) Health;
(8) Physical education; and
(9) A foreign or world language.
(b) Establish a schedule for the periodic review and, if
necessary, revision of the standards of content and performance. The
review must include, without limitation, the review required
pursuant to NRS 390.115 of the results of pupils on the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
(c) Assign priorities to the standards of content and performance
relative to importance and degree of emphasis and revise the
standards, if necessary, based upon the priorities.
2. The standards for computer education and technology must
include a policy for the ethical, safe and secure use of computers
and other electronic devices. The policy must include, without
limitation:
(a) The ethical use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Rules of conduct for the acceptable use of the Internet
and other electronic devices; and
(2) Methods to ensure the prevention of:
(I) Cyber-bullying;
(II) Plagiarism; and
(III) The theft of information or data in an electronic
form;
(b) The safe use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation, methods to:
(1) Avoid cyber-bullying and other unwanted electronic
communication, including, without limitation, communication with
on-line predators;
(2) Recognize when an on-line electronic communication is
dangerous or potentially dangerous; and
(3) Report a dangerous or potentially dangerous on-line
electronic communication to the appropriate school personnel;
-
*AB584*

– 87 –
(c) The secure use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Methods to maintain the security of personal identifying
information and financial information, including, without limitation,
identifying unsolicited electronic communication which is sent for
the purpose of obtaining such personal and financial information for
an unlawful purpose;
(2) The necessity for secure passwords or other unique
identifiers;
(3) The effects of a computer contaminant;
(4) Methods to identify unsolicited commercial material; and
(5) The dangers associated with social networking Internet
sites; and
(d) A designation of the level of detail of instruction as
appropriate for the grade level of pupils who receive the instruction.
3. The standards for social studies must include multicultural
education, including, without limitation, information relating to
contributions made by men and women from various racial and
ethnic backgrounds. The Council shall consult with members of the
community who represent the racial and ethnic diversity of this
State in developing such standards.
4. The standards for health must include mental health and the
relationship between mental health and physical health.
5. The Council shall establish standards of content and
performance for each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8,
inclusive, for English language arts and mathematics. The Council
shall establish standards of content and performance for the grade
levels selected by the Council for the other courses of study
prescribed in subsection 1. The standards for kindergarten and
grades 1, 2 and 3 for English language arts must:
(a) Incorporate phonics-based instruction, including, without
limitation, phonics-based foundational literacy skills that focus
on:
(1) Phonological and phonemic awareness;
(2) Decoding;
(3) Fluency;
(4) Vocabulary; and
(5) Comprehension; and
(b) Integrate science, technology, engineering and
mathematics into instruction in English language arts to expose
pupils to foundational concepts in science, technology,
engineering and mathematics through engaging and age-
appropriate reading materials.
-
*AB584*

– 88 –
6. The Council shall forward to the State Board the standards
of content and performance established by the Council for each
course of study. The State Board shall:
(a) Adopt the standards for each course of study, as submitted
by the Council; or
(b) If the State Board objects to the standards for a course of
study or a particular grade level for a course of study, return those
standards to the Council with a written explanation setting forth the
reason for the objection.
7. If the State Board returns to the Council the standards of
content and performance for a course of study or a grade level, the
Council shall:
(a) Consider the objection provided by the State Board and
determine whether to revise the standards based upon the objection;
and
(b) Return the standards or the revised standards, as applicable,
to the State Board.
 The State Board shall adopt the standards of content and
performance or the revised standards, as applicable.
8. The Council shall work in cooperation with the State Board
to prescribe the examinations required by NRS 390.105.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer contaminant” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4737.
(b) “Cyber-bullying” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388.123.
(c) “Electronic communication” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 388.124.
Sec. 45. Chapter 391 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as section 46 to 52, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 46. 1. A school employee is immune from both
criminal and civil liability for actions taken in good faith to
intervene in physical altercations, fights or other incidents that
pose an imminent risk to the safety of pupils, other school
employees and persons in proximity to the altercation, fight or
incident, provided that:
(a) The school employee is acting within the course and scope
of his or her employment and within the course and scope of his
or her role in maintaining order, discipline or the safety of pupils;
(b) The actions of the school employee are consistent with
federal, state and local laws and the policies of the school district
employing the school employee or the school at which the school
employee is employed relating to the maintenance of safety and
discipline; and
-
*AB584*

– 89 –
(c) Any harm caused by the intervention was not the result of:
(1) Willful or intentional misconduct;
(2) Gross negligence;
(3) Reckless misconduct; or
(4) A conscious, flagrant indifference to the rights or safety
of the person harmed.
2. If any school employee intervenes in a fight or altercation
involving a pupil, the school employee shall report the incident to
school administration as soon as practicable and in accordance
with the policies and protocols established by the school district
employing the school employee or the school at which the school
employee is employed.
3. Each school or school district shall maintain a record of
reports received pursuant to subsection 2 and use the records only
to assess the need for additional training, support or policy
adjustments to improve school safety practices.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Intervene” or “intervention” means taking any physical
or verbal action to prevent, separate or otherwise manage pupils in
a manner designed to avoid imminent harm to pupils, school
employees or others in proximity to the area in which such actions
are taken.
(b) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
who is employed by:
(1) A board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281; or
(2) The governing body of a charter school.
Sec. 47. 1. In consultation with the Teacher and Leaders
Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455, the Department shall
adopt regulations establishing a framework for the establishment
of a performance improvement plan for a postprobationary
administrator who receives an evaluation designating his or her
overall performance as ineffective or minimally effective for 2
consecutive school years.
2. A performance improvement plan must be established for
any postprobationary administrator who receives an evaluation
designating his or her overall performance as ineffective or
minimally effective for 2 consecutive school years.
3. A performance improvement plan established pursuant to
subsection 2 must contain clear and measurable goals for the
improvement of instructional practices, pupil engagement and
academic outcomes that are aligned with educational standards in
this State and that directly address areas of underperformance
identified in the evaluations of the postprobationary administrator.
-
*AB584*

– 90 –
4. A postprobationary administrator for whom a performance
improvement plan is established shall participate in programs of
professional development training to address the areas of
underperformance identified in the evaluations of the
postprobationary administrator, including, without limitation,
professional development training in:
(a) Instructional strategies for improving pupil engagement
and classroom differentiation;
(b) Data-driven instruction and the use of formative
assessments to track pupil progress; or
(c) Classroom management techniques and behavioral
interventions to promote a positive learning environment.
5. Each school district shall ensure that an experienced
mentor or leadership coach is assigned to each postprobationary
administrator for whom a performance improvement plan is
established. The mentor or leadership coach shall:
(a) Provide regular feedback;
(b) Conduct classroom observations; and
(c) Assist the administrator in developing and implementing
new instructional strategies.
6. At least once each school quarter, the principal of the
school of a postprobationary administrator for whom a
performance improvement plan is established, or the
superintendent of schools of a school district or his or her
designee if the postprobationary administrator is a principal, shall
review and assess the progress of the postprobationary
administrator toward achieving the goals of the performance
improvement plan.
Sec. 48. 1. The superintendent of schools of a school
district may place a postprobationary administrator on probation
for a period of 2 school years if, based on the evaluation of the
postprobationary administrator pursuant to NRS 391.710, the
superintendent determines that the postprobationary
administrator:
(a) Is consistently ineffective in meeting instructional practice
standards, pupil performance standards and classroom
management standards; or
(b) Fails to demonstrate adequate progress under a
performance improvement plan established pursuant to section 47
of this act.
2. Upon placing a postprobationary administrator on
probation pursuant to subsection 1, the superintendent shall give
written notice to the postprobationary administrator that the
postprobationary administrator has been placed on probation
pursuant to this section. The written notice must contain an
-
*AB584*

– 91 –
explanation of areas of underperformance for which the
postprobationary administrator has been placed on probation
pursuant to this section and a performance improvement plan
established pursuant to section 47 of this act that details the
support and interventions that will be provided to the
postprobationary administrator.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, during a
period of probation imposed pursuant to this section, the
postprobationary administrator must not be reassigned or
transferred to another school in the school district or otherwise
employed at another school in the school district. The
postprobationary administrator may be reassigned or transferred
during a period of probation imposed pursuant to this section if
the reassignment or transfer is required because of low
enrollment, program elimination or other district-wide operational
needs. Any such transfer or reassignment must be made in
accordance with the policies and procedures of the school district,
and such reassignment or transfer must not conflict with the terms
of the period of probation imposed pursuant to this section.
4. Upon the conclusion of a period of probation imposed
pursuant to this section, the postprobationary administrator must
be evaluated to determine whether the postprobationary
administrator has met improvement goals. If, based on the
evaluation, the postprobationary administrator:
(a) Has met the improvement goals, the postprobationary
administrator must be removed from probation.
(b) Has shown improvement and progress toward meeting the
improvement goals, the period of probation imposed pursuant to
this section may be extended for 1 additional school year and the
postprobationary administrator must continue to receive support
and monitoring under a performance improvement plan
established pursuant to section 47 of this act.
(c) Has failed to make adequate progress toward achieving the
improvement goals, the postprobationary administrator may be
given notice pursuant to NRS 391.820 that the postprobationary
administrator will not be reemployed or the superintendent may
initiate the process for dismissing the postprobationary
administrator pursuant to NRS 391.822, 391.824 and 391.826.
5. A postprobationary administrator who is placed on
probation pursuant to this section shall be deemed a probationary
employee for the purposes of NRS 391.650 to 391.826, inclusive,
and must serve an additional probationary period in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 391.820, except that the duration of
that period of probation must be determined in accordance with
the provisions of this section.
-
*AB584*

– 92 –
6. The postprobationary administrator placed on probation
pursuant to this section:
(a) Shall not be reemployed pursuant to NRS 391.820 or shall
be dismissed pursuant to NRS 391.822, 391.824 and 391.826 if the
postprobationary administrator is determined to have failed to
meet the objectives in the performance improvement plan
established for the postprobationary administrator and the
dismissal is in the best interest of the pupils and the school.
(b) May be reassigned or have any other consequences
imposed only if compelling evidence demonstrates extenuating
circumstances contributing to the underperformance and it is in
the best interest of the pupils in the school district for the
administrator to be reassigned or have other consequences
imposed.
7. The Department shall provide support to a school district
that does not reemploy or dismisses a postprobationary
administrator pursuant to subsection 6. Such support may include,
without limitation:
(a) Assistance in recruiting and hiring highly effective
administrators to fill any resulting vacancies; and
(b) Access to leadership and instructional coaching resources
to support school leadership in managing transitions and
improving instructional leadership practices.
Sec. 49. 1. If the principal of a public school that is a local
school precinct receives an evaluation designating his or her
overall performance as ineffective or minimally effective for 2
consecutive school years or is placed on probation pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 48 of this act, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall, in consultation with the superintendent of
schools of the school district, suspend or modify any applicable
site-based decision-making powers granted to the local school
precinct pursuant to NRS 388G.500 to 388G.810, inclusive,
including, without limitation:
(a) Reassigning responsibility for budgeting, hiring or other
operational functions from the local school precinct to the school
district;
(b) As applicable, requiring the approval of the school district
or the Department for decisions made by the organizational team
or the principal of the local school precinct; or
(c) As applicable, temporarily removing authority from the
organizational team or principal to implement changes in
curriculum, staffing or scheduling.
2. The suspension of site-based decision-making powers
pursuant to subsection 1 must be:
(a) Limited to the duration of the period of intervention; and
-
*AB584*

– 93 –
(b) Documented in writing, with specific reasons for the
suspension and the conditions under which the site-based
decision-making powers will be restored.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Local school precinct” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388G.535.
(b) “Organizational team” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388G.540.
Sec. 50. 1. The Department shall establish a data-tracking
system to monitor programs in this State, or that receive funding
from this State, to provide training for school administrators.
2. The data-tracking system established pursuant to
subsection 1 must record program participation, licensure
completion rates and relevant data to assess the effectiveness of
each program.
3. The Department shall produce an annual report evaluating
the impact on school achievement and pupil achievement of
school administrators who completed training through each
program in this State, or that receives funding from this State, to
provide training for school administrators. The report must:
(a) Analyze the relative performance of school administrators;
(b) Be presented at a meeting of the State Board; and
(c) Include, without limitation:
(1) An evaluation of the direct impact on the academic
performance of pupils of school administrators who received
training from each program. This evaluation must utilize growth
measures as calculated through the statewide system of
accountability for public schools, providing insights into the
effectiveness of each program in preparing school administrators
to positively influence the achievement of pupils.
(2) Comparative data on the performance of school
administrators from different licensure preparation programs,
including traditional institutions of higher education and
alternative routes to licensure. This analysis must examine the
ability of school administrators from each program to drive pupil
growth and improve academic success within their respective
schools.
4. Based on findings from the annual report produced
pursuant to subsection 3, the Department shall make
recommendations to the State Board and the Nevada System of
Higher Education for continuous improvement in administrator
licensure programs, emphasizing evidence-based practices that
demonstrate a positive impact on pupil achievement. The
Department shall work collaboratively with the Nevada System of
Higher Education to establish a data-sharing agreement that
-
*AB584*

– 94 –
facilitates the evaluation of licensure programs and their
effectiveness, which must ensure the secure and accurate sharing
of data necessary to monitor program outcomes and support
evidence-based recommendations.
Sec. 51. 1. In consultation with the Teachers and Leaders
Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455, the Department shall
adopt regulations establishing a framework for the establishment
of a performance improvement plan for a postprobationary
teacher who receives an evaluation designating his or her overall
performance as ineffective or minimally effective for 2 consecutive
school years.
2. A performance improvement plan must be established for
any postprobationary teacher who receives an evaluation
designating his or her overall performance as ineffective or
minimally effective for 2 consecutive school years.
3. A performance improvement plan established pursuant to
subsection 2 must contain clear and measurable goals for the
improvement of instructional practices, pupil engagement and
academic outcomes that are aligned with educational standards in
this State and that directly address areas of underperformance
identified in the evaluations of the postprobationary teacher.
4. A postprobationary teacher for whom a performance
improvement plan is established shall participate in programs of
professional development training to address the areas of
underperformance identified in the evaluations of the
postprobationary teacher, including, without limitation,
professional development training in:
(a) Instructional strategies for improving pupil engagement
and classroom differentiation;
(b) Data-driven instruction and the use of formative
assessments to track pupil progress; and
(c) Classroom management techniques and behavioral
interventions to promote a positive learning environment.
5. Each school district shall ensure that an experienced
mentor or instructional coach is assigned to each postprobationary
teacher for whom a performance improvement plan is established.
The mentor or instructional coach shall:
(a) Provide regular feedback;
(b) Conduct classroom observations; and
(c) Assist the postprobationary teacher in developing and
implementing new instructional strategies.
6. At least once each school quarter, the leadership team of
the school of a postprobationary teacher for whom a performance
improvement plan is established shall review and assess the
-
*AB584*

– 95 –
progress of the postprobationary teacher toward achieving the
goals of the performance improvement plan.
Sec. 52. 1. The superintendent of schools of a school
district may place a postprobationary teacher on probation for a
period of 2 school years if, based on the evaluation of the
postprobationary teacher pursuant to NRS 391.690, the
superintendent determines that the postprobationary teacher:
(a) Is consistently ineffective in meeting instructional practice
standards, pupil performance standards and classroom
management standards; or
(b) Fails to demonstrate adequate progress under a
performance improvement plan established pursuant to section 51
of this act.
2. Upon placing a postprobationary teacher on probation
pursuant to subsection 1, the superintendent shall give written
notice to the postprobationary teacher that the postprobationary
teacher has been placed on probation pursuant to this section. The
written notice must contain an explanation of areas of
underperformance for which the postprobationary teacher has
been placed on probation pursuant to this section and a
performance improvement plan established pursuant to section 51
of this act that details the support and interventions that will be
provided to the postprobationary teacher.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, during a
period of probation imposed pursuant to this section, the
postprobationary teacher must not be reassigned or transferred to
another school in the school district or otherwise employed at
another school in the school district. The postprobationary teacher
may be reassigned or transferred during a period of probation
imposed pursuant to this section if the reassignment or transfer is
required because of low enrollment, program elimination or other
district-wide operational needs. Any such transfer or reassignment
must be made in accordance with the policies and procedures of
the school district, and such reassignment or transfer must not
conflict with the terms of the period of probation imposed
pursuant to this section.
4. Upon the conclusion of a period of probation imposed
pursuant to this section, the postprobationary teacher must be
evaluated to determine whether the postprobationary teacher has
met improvement goals. If, based on the evaluation, the
postprobationary teacher:
(a) Has met the improvement goals, the postprobationary
teacher must be removed from probation.
(b) Has shown improvement and progress toward meeting the
improvement goals, the period of probation imposed pursuant to
-
*AB584*

– 96 –
this section may be extended for 1 additional school year and the
postprobationary teacher must continue to receive support and
monitoring under a performance improvement plan established
pursuant to section 51 of this act.
(c) Has failed to make adequate progress toward achieving the
improvement goals, the postprobationary teacher may be given
notice pursuant to NRS 391.820 that the postprobationary teacher
will not be reemployed or the superintendent may initiate the
process for dismissing the postprobationary teacher pursuant to
NRS 391.822, 391.824 and 391.826.
5. A postprobationary teacher who is placed on probation
pursuant to this section shall be deemed a probationary employee
for the purposes of NRS 391.650 to 391.826, inclusive, and must
serve an additional probationary period in accordance with NRS
391.820, except that the duration of that probationary period must
be determined in accordance with the provisions of this section.
6. The postprobationary teacher placed on probation
pursuant to this section:
(a) Shall not be reemployed pursuant to NRS 391.820 or shall
be dismissed pursuant to NRS 391.822, 391.824 and 391.826 if the
postprobationary teacher is determined to have failed to meet the
objectives in the performance improvement plan established for
the postprobationary teacher and the dismissal is in the best
interest of the pupils and the school.
(b) May be reassigned or have any other consequences
imposed only if compelling evidence demonstrates extenuating
circumstances contributing to the underperformance and it is in
the best interest of the pupils in the school district for the teacher
to be reassigned or have other consequences imposed.
7. The Department shall provide support to a school district
that does not reemploy or dismisses a postprobationary teacher
pursuant to subsection 6. Such support may include, without
limitation:
(a) Assistance in recruiting and hiring highly effective
teachers to fill any resulting vacancies; and
(b) Access to leadership and instructional coaches to support
school leadership in managing transitions and improving teaching
practices.
Sec. 53. NRS 391.019 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.019 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027,
the Commission shall adopt regulations:
(a) Prescribing the qualifications for licensing teachers and other
educational personnel and the procedures for the issuance and
renewal of those licenses. The regulations:
-
*AB584*

– 97 –
(1) Must include, without limitation, the qualifications for
licensing teachers and administrators pursuant to an alternative route
to licensure which provides that the required education and training
may be provided by any qualified provider which has been approved
by the Commission, including, without limitation, institutions of
higher education and other providers that operate independently of
an institution of higher education. The regulations adopted pursuant
to this subparagraph must:
(I) Establish the requirements for approval as a qualified
provider;
(II) Require a qualified provider to be selective in its
acceptance of students;
(III) Require a qualified provider to provide in-person or
virtual supervised, school-based experiences and ongoing support
for its students, such as mentoring and coaching;
(IV) Significantly limit the amount of course work
required or provide for the waiver of required course work for
students who achieve certain scores on tests;
(V) Allow for the completion in 2 years or less of the
education and training required under the alternative route to
licensure;
(VI) Provide that a person who has completed the
education and training required under the alternative route to
licensure and who has satisfied all other requirements for licensure
may apply for a regular license pursuant to sub-subparagraph (VII)
regardless of whether the person has received an offer of
employment from a school district, charter school or private school;
and
(VII) Upon the completion by a person of the education
and training required under the alternative route to licensure and the
satisfaction of all other requirements for licensure, provide for the
issuance of a regular license to the person pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Must require an applicant for a license to teach middle
school or junior high school education or secondary education to
demonstrate proficiency in a field of specialization or area of
concentration by successfully completing course work prescribed by
the Department or completing a subject matter competency
examination prescribed by the Department with a score deemed
satisfactory.
(3) Must not prescribe qualifications which are more
stringent than the qualifications set forth in NRS 391.0315 for a
licensed teacher who applies for an additional license in accordance
with that section.
-
*AB584*

– 98 –
(b) Identifying fields of specialization in teaching which require
the specialized training of teachers.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.125, requiring
teachers to obtain from the Department an endorsement in a field of
specialization to be eligible to teach in that field of specialization.
The regulations must require a teacher to obtain from the
Department an endorsement to be eligible to teach kindergarten
and grades 1, 2 and 3 during a school year beginning on or after
July 1, 2028.
(d) Setting forth the educational requirements a teacher must
satisfy to qualify for an endorsement in each field of specialization.
The regulations must require that to qualify for an endorsement to
teach kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3, a teacher must complete
a course of instruction in foundational literacy skills that satisfies
the requirements set forth in regulations adopted by the
Commission. The Commission shall collaborate with the Nevada
System of Higher Education to include in a program of
preparation for teaching elementary grades at an institution
within the Nevada System of Higher Education a course of
instruction in foundational literacy skills that satisfies the
requirements set forth in regulations adopted by the Commission.
The requirements for a course of instruction in foundational
literacy must include, without limitation:
(1) Instruction in effective methods for teaching
foundational literacy skills aligned with the science of reading,
including, without limitation:
(I) Phonological and phonemic awareness;
(II) Decoding;
(III) Fluency;
(IV) Vocabulary; and
(V) Comprehension;
(2) Techniques for differentiating literacy instruction to
meet the needs of pupils with advanced literacy skills, as well as
pupils with deficiencies in literacy and pupils with disabilities;
(3) Implementation of effective literacy instruction using
high-quality instructional materials in alignment with current
research on the science of reading;
(4) Classroom behavior management, trauma-informed
practices and other developmentally appropriate supports to
ensure a conducive learning environment for literacy instruction;
and
(5) Administration of literacy assessments and the use of
data from such assessments to adapt and improve literacy
instruction based on the needs of pupils.
-
*AB584*

– 99 –
(e) Setting forth the qualifications and requirements for
obtaining a license or endorsement to teach American Sign
Language, including, without limitation, being registered with the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health
and Human Services pursuant to NRS 656A.100 to engage in the
practice of sign language interpreting in a primary or secondary
educational setting.
(f) Requiring teachers and other educational personnel to be
registered with the Aging and Disability Services Division pursuant
to NRS 656A.100 to engage in the practice of sign language
interpreting in a primary or secondary educational setting if they:
(1) Provide instruction or other educational services; and
(2) Concurrently engage in the practice of sign language
interpreting, as defined in NRS 656A.060.
(g) Prescribing course work on parental involvement and family
engagement. The Commission shall:
(1) Work in cooperation with the Office of Parental
Involvement and Family Engagement created by NRS 385.630 in
developing the regulations required by this paragraph.
(2) Establish standards for professional development training
which may be used to satisfy any course work requirement
prescribed pursuant to this paragraph.
(h) Establishing the requirements for obtaining an endorsement
on the license of a teacher, administrator or other educational
personnel in cultural competency.
(i) Authorizing the Superintendent of Public Instruction to issue
a license by endorsement to an applicant who holds an equivalent
license or authorization issued by a governmental entity in another
country if the Superintendent determines that the qualifications for
the equivalent license or authorization are substantially similar to
those prescribed pursuant to paragraph (a).
(j) Establishing the requirements for obtaining an endorsement
on the license of a teacher, administrator or other educational
personnel in teaching courses relating to financial literacy.
(k) Authorizing a person who is employed as a paraprofessional
and enrolled in a program to become a teacher to complete an
accelerated program of student teaching in the same or a
substantially similar area in which the person is employed as a
paraprofessional while remaining employed as a paraprofessional.
(l) Requiring the Department to accept a program of student
teaching or other teaching experience completed in another state or
foreign country by an applicant for a license if the Department
determines that the program or experience substantially fulfills the
standards of a program of student teaching in this State.
-
*AB584*

– 100 –
(m) Authorizing a person who is employed by a public school to
provide support or other services relating to school psychology, if
the person does not hold a license or endorsement as a school
psychologist but is enrolled in a program that would allow the
person to obtain such a license or endorsement, to complete a
program of internship in school psychology while remaining
employed in such a position.
(n) To carry out the provisions of NRS 391B.010.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027, the
Commission may adopt such other regulations as it deems necessary
for its own government or to carry out its duties.
3. Any regulation which increases the amount of education,
training or experience required for licensing:
(a) Must, in addition to the requirements for publication in
chapter 233B of NRS, be publicized before its adoption in a manner
reasonably calculated to inform those persons affected by the
change.
(b) Must not become effective until at least 1 year after the date
it is adopted by the Commission.
(c) Is not applicable to a license in effect on the date the
regulation becomes effective.
Sec. 54. NRS 391.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.031 There are the following kinds of licenses for teachers
and other educational personnel in this State:
1. A license to teach pupils in a program of early childhood
education, which authorizes the holder to teach in any program of
early childhood education in the State.
2. [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
license to teach elementary education, which authorizes the holder
to teach in any elementary school in the State. The holder of a
license to teach elementary education must have an endorsement
to teach kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3 to be eligible to teach
pupils in kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3 on or after July 1, 2028.
3. A license to teach middle school or junior high school
education, which authorizes the holder to teach in his or her major
or minor field of preparation or in both fields in any middle school
or junior high school. He or she may teach only in these fields
unless an exception is approved pursuant to regulations adopted by
the Commission.
4. A license to teach secondary education, which authorizes the
holder to teach in his or her major or minor field of preparation or in
both fields in any secondary school. He or she may teach only in
these fields unless an exception is approved pursuant to regulations
adopted by the Commission.
-
*AB584*

– 101 –
5. A license to teach special education, which authorizes the
holder to teach pupils with disabilities or gifted and talented pupils,
or both.
6. A special license, which authorizes the holder to teach or
perform other educational functions in a school or program as
designated in the license.
Sec. 55. NRS 391.0315 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.0315 1. A person licensed to teach early childhood
education, elementary education, middle school or junior high
school education or secondary education in this State may apply for
and the Superintendent of Public Instruction may issue to that
person an additional license or endorsement to teach early
childhood education, elementary education, middle school or junior
high school education or secondary education, other than for
teaching pupils with disabilities, which is outside the person’s grade
level of experience if the applicant meets the course work
requirements, competency testing requirements and qualifications
for the license [.] or endorsement.
2. A licensed teacher who applies for an additional license or
endorsement pursuant to this section must not be required to
participate in a program of student teaching as a condition for the
issuance of the additional license or endorsement if the applicant
has 3 years of verified teaching experience.
Sec. 56. NRS 391.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.730 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.717, a
postprobationary employee who receives an evaluation designating
his or her overall performance as:
[1.] (a) Ineffective; or
[2.] (b) Developing during 1 year of the 2-year consecutive
period and ineffective during the other year of the period,
 for 2 consecutive school years shall be deemed to be a
probationary employee for the purposes of NRS 391.650 to 391.826,
inclusive, and must serve an additional probationary period in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 391.820.
2. If a postprobationary employee who is deemed to be a
probationary employee pursuant to this section receives an
evaluation designating his or her overall performance as
ineffective for 2 consecutive school years during the additional
probationary period required by this section:
(a) The board of trustees of the school district may notify the
employee in writing during the second or third school year of the
employee’s probationary period, in accordance with NRS 391.820,
that the employee will not be reemployed for the third year of the
probationary period or for the fourth school year as a
postprobationary employee; or
-
*AB584*

– 102 –
(b) The superintendent of the school district may recommend
the dismissal of the probationary employee to the board of trustees
of the school district before the end of a contract year pursuant to
NRS 391.822. If the superintendent makes such a
recommendation, the postprobationary employee who is deemed to
be a probationary employee pursuant to this section is entitled to
notice and a hearing pursuant to NRS 391.824 and 391.826.
3. The Department shall provide support to a school district
that, pursuant to subsection 2, does not reemploy or dismisses a
postprobationary employee who is deemed to be a probationary
employee pursuant to subsection 1. Such support may include,
without limitation:
(a) Assistance in recruiting and hiring highly-qualified
administrators to fill any resulting vacancies; and
(b) Access to leadership and instructional coaches to support
school leadership in managing transitions and improving teaching
practices.
Sec. 57. Chapter 391A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 58 to 61, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 58. 1. A school district and the governing body of a
charter school shall ensure that a course of professional
development training in the science of reading that is approved by
the Department is successfully completed by:
(a) Teachers who teach pupils in kindergarten or grade 1, 2
or 3;
(b) Administrators of schools in which pupils in kindergarten
or grade 1, 2 or 3 are enrolled and other administrators who
supervise such administrators or are responsible for shaping
educational systems that impact pupil achievement in reading; and
(c) Paraprofessionals who directly serve pupils in kindergarten
or grade 1, 2 or 3.
2. Any course of professional development training required
to be completed by an employee pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) May be provided by the school district or governing body or
through an agreement with an institution of higher education or a
regional training program for the professional development of
teachers and administrators.
(b) Must be provided at no cost to the employee.
3. Each teacher who teaches pupils in kindergarten or grade
1, 2 or 3, and each paraprofessional who directly serves pupils in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3, and who was employed to teach or
serve such pupils before August 1, 2025, must successfully
complete the course of professional development training required
by this section not later than the end of the 2027-2028 school year.
-
*AB584*

– 103 –
Each teacher who teaches pupils in kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or
3, and each paraprofessional who directly serves pupils in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3, and who is employed to teach or
serve such pupils on or after August 1, 2025, must successfully
complete the course of professional development training required
by this section not later than 3 years after the employment start
date for the teacher or paraprofessional.
4. Each administrator of a school in which pupils in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3 are enrolled, and any other
administrator who supervises such administrators or is responsible
for shaping educational systems that impact pupil achievement in
reading, and who is employed in such a position before August 1,
2025, must complete the course of professional development
training required by this section not later than the end of the 2027-
2028 school year. Each administrator of a school in which pupils
in kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3 are enrolled, and any other
administrator who supervises such administrators or is responsible
for shaping educational systems that impact pupil achievement in
reading, and who is employed in such a position on or after
August 1, 2025, must complete the course of professional
development training required by this section not later than 3
years after the employment start date of the administrator for that
position.
5. The Department shall develop and post on the Internet
website maintained by the Department a list of courses of
professional development training in the science of reading that
have been approved by the Department.
6. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall:
(a) Maintain such records of the successful completion of
courses of professional development training required by
subsection 1 as necessary to ensure compliance with the
requirements of this section; and
(b) Provide such records to the Department upon request.
7. On or before November 1 of each year, the Department
shall prepare, and post on the Internet website maintained by the
Department, a report on the compliance of each board of trustees
of a school district and governing body of a charter school with
the requirements of this section. The report must contain:
(a) The number of persons who are required to complete the
course of professional development training and the percentage of
such persons who have completed the course of professional
development training, disaggregated by district;
-
*AB584*

– 104 –
(b) A list of the approved providers of courses of professional
development training and the standards applied by the Department
to approve such a course; and
(c) An analysis of trends, challenges and recommendations for
improving compliance and training outcomes.
8. On or before November 1 of each year, the Department
shall submit the report prepared pursuant to subsection 7 to:
(a) The Governor;
(b) The State Board;
(c) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is submitted in an odd-numbered year; or
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is submitted in an even-numbered year;
and
(d) The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school.
9. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section, including, without limitation,
regulations to establish standards for the approval of courses of
professional development in the science of reading and the
approval of providers of such courses.
Sec. 59. 1. The board of trustees of a school district or the
sponsor of a charter school that satisfies the criteria set forth in
subsection 2 may establish an incentive program to recognize and
provide incentives to school administrators who demonstrate
sustained high performance and contribute to measurable
improvements in the academic achievement of pupils.
2. The board of trustees of a school district or the sponsor of
a charter school is eligible to establish an incentive program
pursuant to this section if the proportion of school administrators
in the school district or the proportion of school administrators
within the charter school or network of charter schools, as
applicable, who receive an evaluation designating the
administrator’s performance as highly effective for 2 consecutive
school years is 85 percent or less.
3. If a program is established by a board of trustees of a
school district or a sponsor of a charter school pursuant to
subsection 1 or subsection 1 of section 60 of this act:
(a) Money must be allocated to the board of trustees of the
school district or local educational agency for the charter school,
as applicable, from the Excellence in Education Account in the
manner prescribed by section 17 of this act to pay incentives
pursuant to the program;
-
*AB584*

– 105 –
(b) To the extent that the condition specified in subsection 4 of
section 17 of this act has occurred to cause money to be
transferred to the Excellence in Education Account in accordance
with that subsection, any reserve funds of a public school operated
by a school district which, pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS
388G.650, would be transferred to the Education Stabilization
Account must instead be transferred from the public school to the
school district and used by the school district to pay incentives
pursuant to the program; and
(c) Any unrestricted reserve funds of the charter schools
within the network of charter schools of the sponsor must be
transferred to the local educational agency for the charter schools
to pay incentives pursuant to the program.
 The money described in this section must be allocated equitably
among school administrators and teachers who qualify for an
incentive pursuant to a program established pursuant to this
section or section 60 of this act, as applicable.
4. If a program is established pursuant to subsection 1, the
board of trustees of a school district or the sponsor of a charter
school may make a one-time incentive payment to a school
administrator who receives an evaluation designating the
administrator’s performance as highly effective in each of the 5
years preceding the administrator’s 6th, 12th or 18th anniversary
as a school administrator. The amount of the incentive payment to
a school administrator who qualifies pursuant to this section may
not be more than 10 percent of the annual base salary of the
school administrator on the anniversary date on which the school
administrator qualifies for the incentive. In addition to the
incentive payment authorized by this section, a program
established pursuant to this section may include, without
limitation, the following components:
(a) Career leadership advancement options to maximize the
retention of administrators;
(b) Professional development;
(c) Recognition of a school administrator by the Governor or
the Department, or both; and
(d) Consideration of the school administrator for participation
as a mentor for other school administrators.
5. The Department may adopt regulations for the effective
implementation of a program established pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, guidelines for administering and
distributing funds pursuant to the program.
6. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Department shall:
-
*AB584*

– 106 –
(a) Prepare a report detailing the number of recipients of an
incentive payment made pursuant to this section, the amounts of
incentives paid and the measurable outcomes achieved through
programs established pursuant to this section; and
(b) Submit the report to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next session of
the Legislature.
Sec. 60. 1. The board of trustees of a school district or the
sponsor of a charter school that satisfies the criteria set forth in
subsection 2 may establish an incentive program to recognize and
provide incentives to teachers who demonstrate sustained high
performance and contribute to measurable improvements in the
academic achievement of pupils.
2. The board of trustees of a school district or the sponsor of
a charter school is eligible to establish an incentive program
pursuant to this section if the proportion of teachers in the school
district or the proportion of teachers within the charter school or
network of charter schools, as applicable, who receive an
evaluation designating the teacher’s performance as highly
effective for 2 consecutive school years is 85 percent or less.
3. If a program is established by the board of trustees of a
school district or a sponsor of a charter school pursuant to
subsection 1 or subsection 1 of section 59 of this act:
(a) Money must be allocated to the board of trustees of the
school district or local educational agency for the charter school,
as applicable, from the Excellence in Education Account in the
manner prescribed by section 17 of this act to pay incentives
pursuant to the program;
(b) To the extent that the condition specified in subsection 4 of
section 17 of this act has occurred to cause money to be
transferred to the Excellence in Education Account in accordance
with that subsection, any reserve funds of a public school operated
by a school district which, pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS
388G.650, would be transferred to the Education Stabilization
Account must instead be transferred from the public school to the
school district and used by the school district to pay incentives
pursuant to the program; and
(c) Any unrestricted reserve funds of the charter schools
within the network of charter schools of the sponsor must be
transferred to the local educational agency for the charter schools
to pay incentives pursuant to the program.
 The money described in this section must be allocated equitably
among school administrators and teachers who qualify for an
incentive pursuant to a program established pursuant to this
section or section 59 of this act, as applicable.
-
*AB584*

– 107 –
4. If a program is established pursuant to this section, the
board of trustees of a school district or the sponsor of a charter
school may make a one-time incentive payment to a teacher who
receives an evaluation designating the teacher’s performance as
highly effective in each of the 3 years preceding the teacher’s 4th,
8th, 12th or 16th anniversary as a teacher. The amount of the
incentive payment to a teacher who qualifies pursuant to this
section may not be more than 10 percent of the annual base salary
of the teacher on the anniversary date on which the teacher
qualifies for the incentive. In addition to the incentive payment
pursuant to this section, a program established pursuant to this
section may include, without limitation, the following components:
(a) Professional development;
(b) Recognition of a teacher by the Governor or the
Department, or both; and
(c) Consideration of the teacher for participation as a mentor
for other teachers.
5. The Department may adopt regulations for the effective
implementation of a program established pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, guidelines for administering and
distributing funds pursuant to the program.
6. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Department shall:
(a) Prepare a report detailing the number of recipients of an
incentive payment made pursuant to this section, the amounts of
incentives paid and the measurable outcomes achieved through
programs established pursuant to this section; and
(b) Submit the report to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next session of
the Legislature.
Sec. 61. 1. The Education Service Center is hereby created
as an educational service agency for the purpose of acting as an
educational service agency under 34 C.F.R. § 300.12 to develop,
manage and provide services and programs to local educational
agencies and, as necessary, to other local governments.
2. The governing body of the Education Service Center is the
Board of the Education Service Center, which must consist of the
following members:
(a) Two members appointed by the Governor;
(b) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Majority Leader of the Senate;
(c) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Senate;
(d) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Speaker of the Assembly;
-
*AB584*

– 108 –
(e) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Assembly; and
(f) One member appointed by the State Board of Education.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall call the
first meeting of the Board of the Education Service Center. At its
first meeting and annually thereafter, the members of the Board
shall elect a Chair and Vice Chair from among the members of the
Board. After its first meeting, the Board shall meet as needed at
the call of the Chair.
4. Each member of the Board of the Education Service
Center:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Education Service
Center, is entitled to receive the travel expenses provided for state
officers and employees generally.
5. Each member of the Board of the Education Service
Center serves a term of 2 years and may be reappointed for
additional terms of 2 years in the same manner as the original
appointment. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the
Board must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment not later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs.
6. Within the limits of available money:
(a) The Board of the Education Service Center may appoint an
Executive Director. The Executive Director shall not pursue any
other business or occupation or hold any other office of profit
without the approval of the Board.
(b) The Executive Director may employ such staff as is
necessary to the performance of the functions of the Education
Service Center.
 The Executive Director and any staff of the Education Service
Center are eligible to participate in the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program and the Public Employees’ Retirement System.
7. The Education Service Center:
(a) May not impose or levy any tax or borrow money or incur
indebtedness.
(b) May apply for any available grants and accept any
available gifts, grants, appropriations or donations, and use any
such gifts, grants, appropriations or donations to carry out its
purposes.
(c) May enter into agreements with any agency or political
subdivision of this State, including, without limitation, counties,
cities and school districts, for the purpose of carrying out the
purposes set forth in this section.
8. The Education Service Center:
-
*AB584*

– 109 –
(a) May carry out activities set forth in this title, on behalf of
the Department, and provide services to local educational agencies
throughout this State, including, without limitation, services that
require specialized personnel.
(b) Shall provide support for the initiatives and efforts of this
State to improve the performance of schools and school districts in
this State, including, without limitation, evidence-based and
research-based support for the improvement of schools and school
districts identified for rigorous interventions pursuant to the
provisions of sections 28 to 36, inclusive, of this act.
(c) Shall implement or support the implementation of state or
federally funded initiatives assigned to the Education Service
Center by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(d) Shall avoid duplication of programs and services to ensure
a streamlined and efficient delivery of educational services.
9. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may adopt
regulations to prescribe operational aspects of the Education
Service Center, including, without limitation, accountability,
finance and budgeting, qualifications for the Board and
employees of the Education Service Center and procedures for
contracting.
10. The Education Service Center is hereby deemed a local
educational agency, as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(30)(A), for all
purposes.
Sec. 62. NRS 391A.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.125 1. Based upon the assessment of needs for training
within the region and priorities of training adopted by the governing
body pursuant to NRS 391A.175, each regional training program
shall provide:
(a) Training for teachers and other licensed educational
personnel in the:
(1) Standards established by the Council to Establish
Academic Standards for Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(2) Curriculum and instruction required for the standards
adopted by the State Board;
(3) Curriculum and instruction recommended by the
Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada; [and]
(4) Culturally relevant pedagogy, taking into account cultural
diversity and demographic differences throughout this State [.] ; and
(5) Whole school improvement and turnaround options
described in sections 28 to 36, inclusive, of this act.
(b) Through the Nevada Early Literacy Intervention Program
established for the regional training program, training for teachers
who teach kindergarten and grades 1, 2 or 3 on methods to teach
fundamental reading skills, including, without limitation:
-
*AB584*

– 110 –
(1) [Phonemic] Phonological and phonemic awareness;
(2) [Phonics;] Decoding;
(3) Vocabulary;
(4) Fluency; and
(5) Comprehension . [; and
(6) Motivation.]
(c) Training for administrators who conduct the evaluations
required pursuant to NRS 391.685, 391.690, 391.705 and 391.710
relating to the manner in which such evaluations are conducted.
Such training must be developed in consultation with the Teachers
and Leaders Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455.
(d) Training for teachers, administrators and other licensed
educational personnel relating to correcting deficiencies and
addressing recommendations for improvement in performance that
are identified in the evaluations conducted pursuant to NRS
391.685, 391.690, 391.705 or 391.710.
(e) Training for teachers on methods to teach computer literacy
or computer science to pupils.
(f) At least one of the following types of training:
(1) Training for teachers and school administrators in the
assessment and measurement of pupil achievement and the effective
methods to analyze the test results and scores of pupils to improve
the achievement and proficiency of pupils.
(2) Training for teachers in specific content areas to enable
the teachers to provide a higher level of instruction in their
respective fields of teaching. Such training must include instruction
in effective methods to teach in a content area provided by teachers
who are considered masters in that content area.
(3) In addition to the training provided pursuant to paragraph
(b), training for teachers in the methods to teach basic skills to
pupils, such as providing instruction in reading with the use of
phonics and providing instruction in basic skills of mathematics
computation.
(g) In accordance with the program established by the Statewide
Council pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 391A.135
training for:
(1) Teachers on how to engage parents and families,
including, without limitation, disengaged families, in the education
of their children and to build the capacity of parents and families to
support the learning and academic achievement of their children.
(2) Training for teachers and paraprofessionals on working
with parent liaisons in public schools to carry out strategies and
practices for effective parental involvement and family engagement.
-
*AB584*

– 111 –
(h) Training and continuing professional development for
teachers who receive an endorsement to teach courses relating to
financial literacy pursuant to NRS 391.019 and 396.5198.
2. The training required pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Include the activities set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42), as
deemed appropriate by the governing body for the type of training
offered.
(b) Include appropriate procedures to ensure follow-up training
for teachers and administrators who have received training through
the program.
(c) Incorporate training that addresses the educational needs of:
(1) Pupils with disabilities who participate in programs of
special education; and
(2) Pupils who are English learners.
3. The governing body of each regional training program shall
prepare and maintain a list that identifies programs for the
professional development of teachers and administrators that
successfully incorporate:
(a) The standards of content and performance established by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools
pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(b) Fundamental reading skills; and
(c) Other training listed in subsection 1.
 The governing body shall provide a copy of the list on an annual
basis to school districts for dissemination to teachers and
administrators.
4. A regional training program may include model classrooms
that demonstrate the use of educational technology for teaching and
learning.
5. A regional training program may contract with the board of
trustees of a school district that is served by the regional training
program as set forth in NRS 391A.120 to provide professional
development to the teachers and administrators employed by the
school district that is in addition to the training required by this
section. Any training provided pursuant to this subsection must
include the activities set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42), as deemed
appropriate by the governing body for the type of training offered.
6. To the extent money is available from legislative
appropriation or otherwise, a regional training program may provide
training to paraprofessionals.
7. To the extent that money is available, the Department shall
administer the training required pursuant to paragraph (h) of
subsection 1.
8. As used in this section, “paraprofessional” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 391.008.
-
*AB584*

– 112 –
Sec. 63. NRS 391A.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.175 1. The governing body of each regional training
program shall:
(a) [Adopt] In collaboration with the Department, adopt a
training model, taking into consideration other model programs,
including, without limitation, the program used by the Geographic
Alliance in Nevada.
(b) Assess the training needs of teachers and administrators who
are employed by the school districts within the primary jurisdiction
of the regional training program and adopt priorities of training for
the program based upon the assessment of needs. The board of
trustees of each such school district may submit recommendations to
the appropriate governing body for the types of training that should
be offered by the regional training program.
(c) In making the assessment required by paragraph (b) and as
deemed necessary by the governing body, review the plans to
improve the achievement of pupils prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.650 for individual schools within the primary jurisdiction of
the regional training program.
(d) Prepare a 5-year plan for the regional training program for
review by the Statewide Council, which includes, without
limitation:
(1) An assessment of the training needs of teachers and
administrators who are employed by the school districts within the
primary jurisdiction of the regional training program; and
(2) Specific details of the training that will be offered by the
regional training program for the first 2 years covered by the plan
including, without limitation, the biennial budget of the regional
training program for those 2 years.
 The governing body shall incorporate into the 5-year plan any
revisions recommended by the Statewide Council.
(e) Review the 5-year plan on an annual basis and make
revisions to the plan as are necessary to serve the training needs of
teachers and administrators employed by the school districts within
the primary jurisdiction of the regional training program.
(f) Ensure that the staff of the regional training program
assists in developing and providing training in whole school
improvement efforts throughout this State.
2. The Department, the Nevada System of Higher Education
and the board of trustees of a school district may request the
governing body of the regional training program that serves the
school district to provide training, participate in a program or
otherwise perform a service that is in addition to the duties of the
regional training program that are set forth in the plan adopted
pursuant to this section or otherwise required by statute. An entity
-
*AB584*

– 113 –
may not represent that a regional training program will perform
certain duties or otherwise obligate the regional training program as
part of an application by that entity for a grant unless the entity has
first obtained the written confirmation of the governing body of the
regional training program to perform those duties or obligations.
The governing body of a regional training program may, but is not
required to, grant a request pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 64. Chapter 394 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A school employee is immune from both criminal and civil
liability for actions taken in good faith to intervene in physical
altercations, fights or other incidents that pose an imminent risk to
the safety of pupils, other school employees and persons in
proximity to the altercation, fight or incident, provided that:
(a) The school employee is acting within the course and scope
of his or her employment and within the course and scope of his
or her role in maintaining order, discipline or the safety of pupils;
(b) The actions of the school employee are consistent with
federal, state and local laws and the policies of the school district
employing the school employee or the school at which the school
employee is employed relating to the maintenance of safety and
discipline; and
(c) Any harm caused by the intervention was not the result of:
(1) Willful or intentional misconduct;
(2) Gross negligence;
(3) Reckless misconduct; or
(4) A conscious, flagrant indifference to the rights or safety
of the person harmed.
2. If any school employee intervenes in a fight or altercation
involving a pupil, the school employee shall report the incident to
school administration as soon as practicable and in accordance
with the policies and protocols established by the school employing
the school employee.
3. Each school shall maintain a record of reports received
pursuant to subsection 2 and use these records only to assess the
need for additional training, support or policy adjustments to
improve school safety practices.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Intervene” or “intervention” means taking any physical
or verbal action to prevent, separate or otherwise manage pupils in
a manner designed to avoid imminent harm to pupils, school
employees or others in proximity to the area where such actions
are taken.
(b) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
who is employed by a private school.
-
*AB584*

– 114 –
Sec. 65. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Board of Regents may require each institution within the
System that offers a program of study to satisfy the educational
requirements for a license to teach elementary school to
collaborate with the Department and the Commission on
Professional Standards in Education to develop within the
program of study a course of instruction in foundational literacy
skills that satisfies the requirements adopted pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 391.019 to qualify for an
endorsement to teach kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3.
Sec. 66. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Treasurer for the purpose of carrying out
the Nevada Integrity in Academic Funding Program established
pursuant to section 38 of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $425,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $425,000
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 67. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of section 42 of this act the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,000,000
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
-
*AB584*

– 115 –
Sec. 68. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $4,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $4,000,000
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 69. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 70. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 71. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 65, inclusive, 69 and 70 of this act become
effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
3. Sections 66, 67 and 68 of this act become effective on
July 1, 2025.
4. Section 42 of this act expires by limitation on June 30, 2029.
H
-
*AB584*